# A File for storing miscellaneous vocabulary picked up from shows/games/whatever
In Japanese, "tada" (ただ) is a versatile word that can mean "just," "only," or "however."
In Japanese, "daro" (だろう) expresses a degree of uncertainty or speculation
In Japanese, "gaten" (合点) means understanding, agreement, or consent. It's a way of expressing that one has grasped a concept or agrees with something. It can also refer to the moment of suddenly understanding something. 
In Japanese, "hiko" (ひこ) can mean boy or son. It's also used as a suffix, often associated with names for boys.
The Japanese word kanarazu (必ず) means always, certainly, or without fail. It expresses a strong sense of necessity or certainty, indicating that something will happen without exception
"Soro soro" (そろそろ) in Japanese means "soon," "before long," or "it's about time". It's often used to indicate that something is going to happen or that it's the right time to do something
n Japanese, "jakusha" (弱者) means "the weak" or "vulnerable". It refers to individuals or groups who are considered weaker or more susceptible to harm than others. 
The Japanese phrase "mueni" (むえん) translates to "unrelated," "unconnected," "irrelevant," or "indifferent". It can also mean "having nothing to do". The Kanji "無" (mu) means "no" or "none," while "縁" (en) means "connection," "relationship," or "bond". 
"Tōzen" (当然) in Japanese means "natural," "as a matter of course," or "of course." It's a way of saying something is expected or logical. It can also imply that something is reasonable and doesn't require explanation
In Japanese, "daga" (だが) functions as a conjunction, roughly equivalent to "but," "however," or "yet" in English. It's used to connect two sentences where the second sentence presents a contrasting or unexpected element compared to the first
In Japanese, "mataku" (まったく) means "entirely," "completely," "wholly," or "really," and can also be used as an interjection expressing exasperation, like "good grief". It can also be used to emphasize something, like "completely wrong,
"Zehi" (ぜひ) in Japanese means "certainly, without fail, by all means" and is often used to politely request something or express a strong desire for something to happen. It conveys a hopeful "I want to" or "I want you to". 
如何に 【いかに】(ikani). Meaning: how; in what way; how much; to what extent.
In Japanese, "zettai" (絶対) means absolutely, definitely, unconditionally, or without fail. It's often used to express strong certainty or affirmation, similar to "definitely" or "absolutely" in English
In Japanese, "saikin" (最近) means "recently," "lately," or "these days". It is used to indicate a period of time that is relatively near the present.
Japanese word "shinsou" (真相) translates to truth or real situation. It refers to the actual facts or circumstances of something, as opposed to a misleading or deceptive account. For example, it could be used to describe the "true story" of an event or the "real reason" behind a person's actions
Kara (から): This particle indicates the starting point or origin, whether in space, time, or other contexts. It can be translated as "from," "since," or "after" depending on the context.
Made (まで): This particle indicates the ending point or limit, often used in conjunction with "kara" to define a range or duration. It can be translated as "until," "to," or "as far as
ですから - desukara - so, therefore
もし (~たら) - moshi _ tara _ - if _... then _.... 
～けど - kedo - but 
The Japanese particle "ga" (が) functions similarly to the English word "but" when used to connect sentences. It can also be used to introduce a new subject, emphasize the subject, or distinguish it from others. When used to join sentences, it often creates a contrasting or contrasting but not necessarily contradictory, relationship between the clauses. 
"Keshitai" (消した) in Japanese means "deleted," "erased," or "turned off." It can also mean "extinguished" or "killed," depending on the context. The kanji characters 消 (kete, to erase) and した (shita, past tense) combine to form this meaning
In Japanese, "tetsudai" (手伝い) means help or assistance. It's a general term that refers to helping someone with something, like chores, work, or studying
"Mitakunai" (見たくない) in Japanese means "I don't want to see it" or "I don't want to look at it". It is a combination of the verb "mīru" (見る, to see) and the negative particle "takunai" (たくない, do not want to
In Japanese, "monode" (もんで) means "because" or "for that reason". It's a conjunctive particle indicating a cause or reason, often used in spoken Japanese and can be shortened to "mon" (もん). 
n Japanese, "konna" (こんな) translates to "this kind of," "this sort of," or "like this," depending on the context. It's a pre-noun adjectival used to describe the characteristics or nature of something close to the speaker
The Japanese word "Reiki" (霊気) means "mysterious atmosphere, miraculous sign" or "universal life energy". It is composed of two Japanese characters: "rei" (霊), meaning universal or spiritual, and "ki" (気), meaning life force or energy. 
"Shugyosha" (修行者) in Japanese translates to "practitioner" or "ascetic". It generally refers to a person who dedicates themselves to rigorous training or practice, often in the context of Buddhism or Zen, seeking spiritual enlightenment or mastery. In the context of samurai culture, it specifically refers to a warrior who undertakes a pilgrimage or quest to hone their skills through independent study and practice, inspired by the ascetic wanderings of Zen monks
大凶. = だいきょう - daikyou - terrible luck, very bad luck.
In Japanese, "butai" (部隊) means "unit" or "team," often used in a military context. Specifically, it refers to a group of soldiers or a military formation. For example, "Kido Butai" refers to the mobile fleet of the Imperial Japanese Navy during World War II. In other contexts, "butai" can also refer to a "group" or "team" in a broader sense, like a sports team or a work team. 
In Japanese, "chouchou" (蝶々) or "choucho" (蝶) refers to a butterfly. It's a common and widely understood term for the insect. "Chou" (蝶) is the Kanji character meaning butterfly, and "chouchou" is the repeated form
The phrase "jitsu hou" (実法) in Japanese means "true law," "true principle," or "true rule." It generally refers to a principle or law that is genuine, valid, or real, as opposed to something that is artificial or false. Here's a more detailed breakdown: 実 (jitsu): This kanji means "real," "true," "solid," "substance," or "actual." It can also refer to the "fruit" of a tree or a harvest. 法 (hou): This kanji means "law," "rule," "principle," "method," or "regulation". Therefore, when combined, "jitsu hou" (実法) suggests a law or principle that is based on truth, reality, or genuine substance 
In Japanese, "shifu" (師傅, しふ) translates to "master," "teacher," or "mentor" and is used as a term of respect. It's similar to the Japanese term "Sensei" but can have a slightly more emphasized meaning of authority and expertise, according to Wiktionary. The term "shifu" can also refer to the practice of making paper thread, which is a traditional Japanese craft. 
In Japanese, "tokubetsu" (特別) means special, unusual, or extraordinary. It can also be used to describe something particular or exceptional. In the context of sake, "tokubetsu" is a term that indicates a higher quality or specific brewing method
In Japanese, "saino" (才能) translates to talent, ability, or gift. It refers to a natural aptitude or innate skill that someone possesses. The word can also be used to describe someone who is gifted or naturally talented in a particular area. 
In Japanese martial arts, zanshin (残心) refers to a state of relaxed alertness and unwavering awareness, often translated as "remaining mind" or "remaining spirit". It signifies the ability to maintain complete focus and vigilance in the face of danger, both during and after an attack, ready to react or continue the flow of action. 
In Japanese, "mezurashii" (珍しい) means rare, unusual, or uncommon. It's an adjective used to describe things or situations that don't happen often. It can also imply a sense of curiosity or novelty. 
The Japanese word "yuuki" (勇気) means courage, bravery, and boldness. It's a fundamental concept in many aspects of Japanese culture, including martial arts like karate. The kanji characters for "yuuki" are "勇" (yu, meaning courage) and "気" (ki, meaning spirit or heart). 
In Japanese, "kensho" (見性) translates to "seeing one's nature" or "seeing one's essential nature". In the context of Zen Buddhism, it refers to the initial experience of enlightenment, a sudden awakening to one's true nature or Buddha-nature. It's a glimpse of reality that precedes full enlightenment, which is also known as sator
choku choku = frequently
The Japanese word "ikatsu" (いかす) can have several meanings depending on the context. It primarily means "to be cool, to be smart, to be stylish, to be sharp," or "to leverage, to make use of, to capitalize on." It can also be used more generally to express something as "awesome" or "impressive". 
Choudai = get
issho ni gohan tabe nai = won't you have lunch together? (using the negative 'nai' is considered more polite)
ずっと = zuto = much
どうして = doushite = why
ですから = desu kara = so, therefore
いかがですか = ikaga desu ka = would you like
<time> までに <verb> = made ni = by
レポートは 明日までに 書きます。 = repoto wa ashita made ni kakimasu = I will write up the report by tomorrow.
自転車 で 駅 まで 行きます。 = jitensha de eki made ikimasu = I will go to the station by bicycle 
物価 = ぶっか = bu-ka = cost of living
億 = おく = oku = hundred million
家賃 = やちん = yachin = rent
現金 = げんきん = cash
久しぶりです = hisashiburi desu = long time no see
どうやって = douya-te = how?
これから = kore kara = from now
In Japanese, "mendo" (面倒) can mean ==trouble, bother, or nuisance==. It's often used to express that something is inconvenient or burdensome, like "it's a hassle". The word is often written using kana (めんど) rather than kanji.
"Kwashiku" (詳しく, kuwashiku) in Japanese means =="in detail" or "fully"==. It's an adverb used to indicate that something is being explained or described with thoroughness and accuracy
すうせん suusen. Meaning: thousands; several thousand
In Japanese, "jouhou" (情報) means ==information, news, or report==. It can also refer to "intelligence" or data contained in characters, signals, or code
In Japanese, "muda" (無駄) means ==wastefulness, uselessness, or futility==. It's a key concept in lean manufacturing and the Toyota Production System (TPS). Muda refers to any activity that doesn't add value to the product or service from the customer's perspective.
The Japanese word "sumari" (つまり) means "==in other words," "in short," or "to sum up."== It's a grammatical particle used to provide a summary or explanation of something previously said
In Japanese, "mataku" (まったく) can be translated as "==really, truly, entirely, completely, wholly, perfectly" or "indeed"==. It can also be used as an interjection, like "good grief," when expressing exasperation
In Japanese, "saiwai" (幸い) means ==good fortune, happiness, luck, or blessing==. It can refer to a fortunate occurrence or a state of happiness, especially when bestowed by a higher power like gods or Buddhas. It can also be used adverbially as "luckily" or "fortunately".
The Japanese word "hanate" is not a commonly used word in its own right. However, it's a slightly shortened and simplified form of the verb "hanasu" (放す), which means "==to release," "to let go," or "to set free"==. So, "hanate" can be understood as a variant or shortened form of this verb, still implying the same meaning of release or letting go
The Japanese word "zutto" (ずっと) can be translated as =="continuously," "all the time," "the whole time," "ever since," or "by far"==. It implies something lasting or enduring for a significant period. In comparisons, it can also mean "much" or "by far". For example, "ずっと良い" (zutto ii) means "much better" or "by far better."
kana  - I wonder (instead of just 'ka' for a question, add 'na' to say 'I wonder')
行き方を説明してください = ike kata setsumei shite kudasai = Please explain the directions to me.
お祈り = おいのり = oinori = pray
結構 です = けっこう です = ke-kou desu = no thank you 
どういたしまして = Dōitashimashite = You're welcome
これから お世話 になります = kore kara osewa ni narimasu = thank you for taking care of me on this occasion
よろしくおねがいします = yoroshiku onegaishimasu = Please be kind to me
残業(する) = ざんぎょう(する) = zangyou(suru) = overtime work
お釣り = otsuri = change (money)
役に立つ = yaku ni tatsu = helpful - 
これは 役に立ちます = kore wa yaku ni tatsu = This will be helpful 
都合 が 悪い = tsugou ga warui = It's inconvenient
いつか = itsuka = someday
冬になりました。寒くなりました。= fuyu ni narimashita. samukunarimashita =It's winter now. It's getting cold.
かばんを持ちましょうか。 = kaban o mochimashou ka = shall I hold your bag?
どうしましたか = dou shimashita ka? = what's wrong?
どうやって = dou ya-te = how?
空港 まで どうやって 行きます か = kuukou made dou ya-te ikimasu ka? = How do I get to the airport
お帰りなさい = okaerinasai = welcome home
どのぐらい = dono gurai = how long (time)?
大学 まで どのくらい かかります か = daigaku made dono kurai kakarimasu ka? = How long will it take to get to the university?
独身 = どくしん = dokushin =  single
喉がかわ渇く = nodo ga kawaku =  become thirsty
喉がかわ渇きましたね。何か飲みませんか = nodo ga kawakimashita ne? = I'm getting thirsty. Shall we drink something?
漢方 (kanpō). The term is derived from two Chinese characters: "han" (漢) referring to the Han Dynasty in China and "po" (方) meaning "method" or "prescription"
我慢して = gaman shitei = endure it
もうちょっと我慢してください。 = Mou chotto gaman shitekudasai = Please endure it just a little bit more.
The Japanese word for ambiguity is 曖昧 (aimai). It's a concept that goes beyond simple vagueness; it encompasses a nuanced form of communication that allows for multiple interpretations and leaves room for personal understanding. 
はんこ = A "hanko" stamp, often referred to as an "inkan," is a personalized Japanese seal used instead of a signature on documents
自意識 = じいしき = Self-awareness
自覚 = じかく = jigaku = self aware / consciousness
自覚はあるんだ = Jikaku wa aru nda = you are self aware
きも(い) = kimo(i) = gross/disgusting/cringy
地獄 =  じごく = jigoku = hell realm /  misery; nightmare; inferno
どっち = dochi =  which?
一度も = いちども = ichidomo = never
一度も 京都 へ行った こと が ありません = ichidomo kyotou he ita koto ga arimasen = I have never been to Kyoto.
修理 (する) = しゅうり(する) = shuuri suru = repair
始まる = hajimaru = start (intransitive)
映画は10時に始まります = eiga jyuu ji ni hajimarimasu = The movie starts at  10  o'clock.
"Yōgi-sha" (容疑者) in Japanese translates to suspect in English. It refers to a person who is suspected of committing a crime or wrongdoing. 
妄想的な = Mōsō-tekina = delusional
"Yoroshii" (よろしい) in Japanese translates to "good," "okay," "all right," or "fine" in English. It's a polite way of saying "yes" or "ok". It can also mean "acceptable," "proper," or "convenient," depending on the context
In the Japanese phrase "sono tori" (その通り), "sono" (その) means "that" or "the same," and "tori" (通り) means "way," "manner," or "path." So, "sono tori" means "in that way," "exactly," or "as is." It's used to express agreement or to indicate that something is the same as what was previously mentioned,. For example, it could mean "just like that" or "that's exactly right.
だが • (da ga) though, although, however, but, be that as it may, that said
In English, "masaka" (まさか) in Japanese translates to "no way," "you can't be serious," "that's impossible," or "you don't mean it." It expresses disbelief, surprise, or shock at something unexpected. It can also mean "unexpectedly," "inconceivably," or "impossibly". 
"Majika" (まじか) in Japanese is a slang expression that translates to "really?" or "no way!" in English. It's used to express surprise or disbelief, often in response to something unexpected or shocking. It's similar to "seriously?" or "really?" in English, but is more informal. 
こうして kōshite. Parts of speech conjunction thus; in this way.
One thing that many Japanese do, is communicate via silence. They have a name for it: “mokusatsu” (黙殺), literally: death by silence.
In Japanese grammar, 〜たら (tara) is a conditional form that can mean "if," "when," or "after." It's a versatile tool for expressing various conditions and scenarios, from simple if-then situations to more complex hypothetical ones
The Japanese word "yakusoku" (約束) translates to "promise", "agreement", or "arrangement" in English. It can also be used to refer to a physical or social contract
The English idiom "put the cart before the horse" translates to the Japanese proverb 本末転倒 (honmatsu tentou). This phrase means to do things in the wrong order, reverse the correct order of operations, or prioritize something less important before something more important. 
The Japanese word "ochitsuke" translates to "stay calm" or "calm down" in English. It can also refer to a state of calmness, composure, or serenity. In Japanese culture, it's valued as a quality of personal and professional conduct. 
成功 = Seikou = success; achievement​(worldly)
The Japanese word "shishō" (師匠) generally translates to "master," "teacher," or "mentor" in English. It refers to a person who has achieved a high level of expertise and is respected for their knowledge and skills in a particular field, such as martial arts, traditional arts, or other crafts. 
The Japanese phrase "toni kaku" (とにかく) translates to "anyway," "in any case," or "at all events." It's used to introduce an action or statement that is being done regardless of other considerations. It's often used when someone wants to emphasize a point or action despite potential obstacles or alternative options
"Sugoku" (すごく) in Japanese means "very" or "immensely" in English. It's used as an adverb to intensify the meaning of an adjective or verb. For example, "sugoku oishii" (すごくおいしい) means "very delicious." 
The Japanese word "hikousen" (飛行船) means airship in English. It's a combination of two kanji: "hikou" (飛行), meaning "flight," and "sen" (船), meaning "ship." 
The Japanese word "seishin" (精神) translates to mind, spirit, soul, heart, or ethos in English. It can also refer to a person's state of mind, mentality, or attitude
"Naruhodo" (なるほど) in Japanese translates to "I see," "I understand," or "I agree" in English. It's a common Japanese expression used to acknowledge a statement or show agreement with someone's words. While it can be used in a polite manner, it's important to be mindful of the context, as using it with an older person or superior might be seen as overbearing
The Japanese word "antei" (安定) in English translates to stability, steadiness, consistency, equilibrium, balance, or composure. It can refer to a state of being stable, balanced, or calm, as well as the act of stabilizing something or making it stable
"Tashikani" (確かに) in Japanese means "definitely," "surely," or "indeed." It's used to express agreement or certainty, often as a response to a statement. It's a common way to say "you're right" or "that's true" in both formal and casual settings
"tekitou" perfunctory; half-minded; sloppy; lazy; careless; noncommittal; unreliable; irresponsible; haphazard​ テキトー
CorruptSean = The most common Japanese translation for "corruption" in English is 汚職 (oshoku), which typically refers to corruption in politicians or public officials. Other options include 堕落 (dōraku), which can mean moral corruption or decay, and 堕落化 (dōraku-ka), which signifies the process of becoming corrupted. Additionally, 腐敗した (fuhai-shita), meaning "corrupted," is used to describe someone who is dishonest or immoral. 
"Kaimei" (解明) in Japanese translates to "clarification" or "elucidation" in English. It can also mean "explanation" or "explication". Essentially, it describes the act of making something clear or easy to understand. 
"それこそ" (sore koso) in Japanese can be translated to "precisely," "for sure," or "that is precisely" in English. It emphasizes the preceding word or phrase, highlighting that the statement is true or significant. 
In English, "reliable" means "deserving trust; dependable." In Japanese, the phrase "信頼できる" (shinnrai dekiru) translates to "reliable" and means the same thing. It implies that someone or something can be trusted to do what is expected of them or perform their function properly
The Japanese word "hoshou" (保証) can be translated into English as guarantee, security, assurance, or warranty. It can also refer to a written guarantee, guarantee letter, or warranty card. In some contexts, it can also mean compensation
The most common Japanese translation for "evidence" is 証拠 (shouko). It can also be translated as 根拠 (konyo), which means "basis" or "ground". "証拠" is generally used to refer to concrete proof, while "根拠" can be used more broadly to refer to the foundation for a belief or argument. 
The Japanese word "keikaku" (計画) means "plan" in English. It refers to a carefully thought-out course of action, a scheme, or an arrangement to achieve a specific goal. For example, "keikaku" can be used in the phrase "keikaku wo suru" (計画をする), which translates to "to make a plan" or "to plan". 
"Mukashi" (昔) in Japanese translates to "long ago," "once upon a time," or "in the past". It can be used to refer to a period of time that is relatively distant, even if not overly far back, and can be used to talk about events or things from the past. The word is often associated with folktales and stories about the past. 
In English, "mystic" refers to a person who practices or believes in religious mysticism, or something that is mysterious and involves spiritual powers. In Japanese, the word for "mystic" is 神秘 (shinpi). Here's a breakdown of the Japanese words related to "mystic": 
神秘 (shinpi): This is the most direct translation of "mystic" and can refer to a person who is mystic, or something that is mystical.
神秘主義者 (shinpi shugi sha):This translates to "mysticism believer" or "mystic" and refers to a person who believes in or practices religious mysticism.
神秘的な (shinpi-teki na):This translates to "mystical" and describes something that is mysterious or involves spiritual powers.
"Bochi bochi" (ぼちぼち) in Japanese roughly translates to "so-so" or "okay" in English. It is used to describe a situation that is neither very good nor very bad, just moderate or average. It's often used in response to questions like "how are you?" or "how's business?
Omikuji (おみくじ or 御神籤) are fortunes, generally bought from temples and shrines in Japan. “Omikuji” is often translated as “sacred lot.” The word kuji means lottery, and getting your omikuji always comes with an element of randomness.
The Japanese word "seisan" (生産) in English means production or output. It can also refer to the concept of birth or childbirth
"Shiharai" (支払い) in Japanese translates to "payment" or "payout" in English. It refers to the act of making a payment or the amount of money paid. For example, you might say "rent shiharai" (rent payment) or "kakushi shiharai" (hidden payments). 
"Tanoshikatta" in Japanese translates to "it was fun" or "it was enjoyable" in English. It's the past tense form of the adjective "tanoshii" (楽しい), which means "fun" or "pleasant". 
The Japanese word "genkaku" (幻覚) translates to hallucination in English. It refers to a perception of something that is not real, like seeing or hearing something that doesn't exist. 
The Japanese word "hanshou" (反省) means reflection or self-reflection. It refers to the act of carefully considering one's actions, mistakes, or thoughts to learn from them and improve. This concept is also important in Japanese culture, where it's often associated with apologizing for errors and making a commitment to do better in the future
知識は運命を変える = Chishiki wa unmei o kaeru = knowledge can change fate
Phrase. 南 ( な ) 無 ( も ) • (namo) (Buddhism) Used in Buddhist salutations or expressions of faith: to salute; to homage or to take refuge (a Buddha or a Bodhisattva)
事務所 = Jimusho = office
"Sono toori" (その通り) in Japanese translates to "exactly," "that's right," or "quite so" in English. It's used to express agreement with something that has been said or suggested. 
Sono (その): Means "that" or "this".
Toori (通り): Means "way," "road," or "manner".
"Zutto" (ずっと) is a Japanese adverb that translates to "always," "the whole time," "continuously," or "forever" in English. It can also mean "by far," "much better," or emphasize a point about something lasting for a long time. 
The Japanese word "mitashi" (満たし) can be translated into English as "satisfying" or "fulfillment." It can also refer to the state of something being filled, or meeting a requirement or need. 
調査 (ちょうさ):This word translates to "investigation," "examination," or "inquiry." It's a general term used for any type of investigation, like a study, research, or official inquiry. For example, "a study to investigate why so few women are managers" could be translated as "女性の経営者が極めて少ない理由を調査する研究". 
捜査 (そうさ):This word signifies "investigation" or "search," often used in the context of law enforcement. It implies a more formal and official investigation, like a police investigation into a crime. "They're still investigating the accident" could be translated as "彼らはまだその事故を捜査中だ". 
捜索 (そうさく): This word means "search" or "exploration," usually in a physical sense. It's often used when searching for something or someone, like a missing person. For example, "search for the missing children" could be translated as "行方不明な子供たちを捜索する". 
"kure" is much more casual but also more forceful, kind of like, "please! I'm begging you!" as if it's some kind of emergency or you're asking for something you really need
The Japanese word "antai" (安心) translates to peace, security, tranquility, or calmness in English. It signifies a state of being free from worry or disturbance, often used to describe a sense of well-being or a calm situation. 
The Japanese word 光景 (こうけい), pronounced "koukei", means scene, spectacle, sight, or view in English. It refers to a visual scene, as in something you can see. 
とにかく・Tonikaku means anyway. Just as the meaning implies, it is a transition before concluding or making a summary statement.
The Japanese word "kioku" (記憶) means memory or remembrance in English. It can also refer to the act of remembering or being remembered. 
The Japanese word "ayamachi" (あやまち) translates to error, fault, indiscretion, or lack of prudence in English. It essentially means making a mistake, a slip-up, or acting inappropriately. 
The Japanese term for "side effect" is 副作用 (ふくさよう), pronounced "fukusayō". It translates to "side effect" or "adverse reaction" in English. The word is used to describe an unplanned and often unpleasant effect that occurs in addition to the main effects of a drug, treatment, or situation
"Nante koto" (なんてこと) in Japanese can be translated to "what a thing," "what a terrible thing," or "what," depending on the context and the speaker's tone. It often expresses disbelief, astonishment, or strong emotion. 
The Japanese word for "rumor" is 噂 (uwasa). It refers to stories or pieces of information that are being circulated, but may not be true
"Tekito" (テキトー) in Japanese is a multifaceted word that can mean anything from "approximate," "suitable," or "moderate" to "sloppy," "irresponsible," or "lazy." It captures the idea of being flexible and casual, sometimes in a positive way, and sometimes in a negative way. 
費用と損失 = Hiyō to sonshitsu = costs and losses
In Japanese, "protest" is commonly translated as 抗議 (こうぎ), which can also mean "objection" or "remonstrance". The Japanese term 反対 (はんたい) also translates to "opposition" or "against," and can be used to describe protests as well. 
"Tashikani" (確かに) in Japanese means "definitely," "surely," or "certainly". It's often used to express agreement with something that has been said, or to emphasize something that is already clea
The Japanese word "kenshin" (剣心) can be translated into English in a few ways, depending on the context. Generally, it means "sword heart" or "blade heart." It can also refer to a dedication to something
The Japanese word for "ceremony" can be translated as 儀式 (gishiki) or 儀礼 (girei). Both words are commonly used to refer to a formal event, ritual, or protocol
The Japanese word "kinkyuu" (緊急) means urgent or emergency in English. It's a term used to describe situations requiring immediate action or attention.
In English, "outpost" generally translates to "前哨地 (ぜんしょうち)" or "辺境の植民地 (へんきょうのしょくみんち)" in Japanese. "前哨地" (zenshou-chi) means a small settlement or military base located in a remote area for observation, defense, or trade. "辺境の植民地" (henkyo no shokuminchi) translates to a settlement or colony in a frontier or remote area. 
The Japanese term "chousai" (弔祭) means condolences, mourning, or funeral in English. It refers to the act of expressing sorrow or grief, typically in the context of a death or loss
The Japanese word "bunpou" (文法) translates to "grammar" in English. It refers to the rules and structures of a language that govern how words are combined to form sentences. The term is often used in the context of learning or studying Japanese gramma
The Japanese word "ayashi" is often translated as "healing," "soothing," or "comfort" in English. It can also refer to therapy or solace. In some contexts, it might also relate to luxury or indulging oneself. 癒し (iyashi): This is the most common spelling and refers to the feeling of being healed, comforted, or at peace
The Japanese phrase "toriaezu" (とりあえず) means "for now," "temporarily," or "tentatively." In the context of an izakaya, it's often used when ordering the first drink ("toriaezu beeru," meaning "beer for now") or when placing an initial order of food, indicating that more might be ordered later. 
rare, unusual = 珍 めずら しい • (mezurashii) - i (adverbial 珍 めずら しく (mezurashiku)) rare, unusua
In English, "stranded" means unable to leave a place, usually due to a problem like lack of transportation or being stuck in a situation. In Japanese, the most common translation for "stranded" to convey this meaning is 立ち往生 (たちおうせい), which means "unable to leave, stuck, or immobilized". 
閉じ込められた (tojikomerareta): While meaning "locked up" or "imprisoned", it can also imply being trapped in a metaphorical sense. 
引っ掛かった (hikkakatta): This means "caught in" or "stuck in," like getting caught in a trap or a metaphorical predicament. 
"Wari wari" (わりわり) is a casual way to say "sorry" or "my bad" in Japanese, particularly used by young men. It's a shortened and informal version of "warui warui" (わるいわるい), which means "bad bad". While "gomen" (ごめん) is a more common and polite way to say "sorry", "wari wari" is acceptable in casual settings among close friends or when expressing a minor apology
"Dekinai" (できない) in Japanese means "cannot" or "unable to." It's the negative form of "dekiru" (できる), which means "can" or "to be able to". 
The Japanese words for "analyze" depend on the specific context. The most common word for "analyze" is 分析する (bunseki suru), meaning to analyze or examine thoroughly. Another phrase used is 解析する (kaiseki suru), which translates to analyze or resolve, often used in a more formal or technical context. 
分析する (bunseki suru): This is a general term for analyzing, examining in detail, or performing an analysis. It's often used when the goal is to understand something by considering its parts or components. 
解析する (kaiseki suru): This term is similar to analyze, but it often implies a more in-depth, scientific or technical examination. It's also used when breaking down complex systems or information into smaller parts. 
The Japanese word "teisatsu" (偵察) translates to "reconnaissance" in English. It refers to the act of gathering information about a place or situation, often in a military context, by sending individuals or using technology to observe and gather intelligence. 
市民 = Shimin = citizen
* 問題 (mondai): This translates to "problem" or "issue."
* 苦労 (kurou): This translates to "hardship," "struggle," or "difficulty."
* 困る (komaru): This means "to be in trouble," "to be bothered," or "to have difficulties."
* 迷惑 (meiwaku): This translates to "inconvenience," "annoyance," or "trouble."
* 障害 (shōgai): This translates to "obstacle," "impediment," or "disability."
* 心配 (shinpai): This translates to "worry" or "concern."
The Japanese word "さて" (sate) translates to "now," "so," "well," or "well then" in English, depending on the context. It's often used to signal a change in topic, a transition, or an introduction to a new idea or action. The phrase "さてっと" (satetto) is similar in meaning to "さあ" (saa), which means "here we go". 
霊能力者 = Rei nōryoku-sha = Psychic
The Japanese word "keikai" (けいかい) can have two main meanings depending on the context. It can refer to =="caution" or "vigilance", or it can mean "lightness" or "carefree"==
"Dattebayo" (だってばよ)  It's not a literal translation and doesn't have a precise meaning in English. The closest translations used in English dubs are "==Believe it!"== ==(originally) or "Y'know?"==
かばん を 持ちましょう か。 = "Shall I hold the bag?."
"Yakusen" (薬箋, やくせん) in Japanese means prescription. It refers to the written instructions from a doctor or other healthcare professional for a patient's medication. 
The Japanese word "kitou" (祈祷) can have multiple meanings depending on the context. It primarily means prayer, grace, or exorcism. It can also refer to the glans penis (亀頭), or mean return to base in a military context (帰投).
祈祷 (kitou): This is the most common meaning. It refers to prayer, grace, or exorcism. 
亀頭 (kitou): This specific meaning refers to the glans penis. 
帰投 (kitou): In a military context, "kitou" (帰投) means the act of returning to base, for example, a military vehicle or ship
"Saboritai" (サボりたい) in Japanese is a colloquial expression meaning "I want to be truant" or "I want to skip out" on something, like work or school. It combines the verb "saboru" (サボる), which means "to skip out," "to be truant," or "to play hooky," with the desire or intention suffix "-tai" (-たい). Therefore, "saboritai" indicates a desire to avoid or skip a responsibility or obligation. 
The Japanese word "chousei" (調整) means "adjustment," "regulation," "coordination," or "tuning". It can refer to making something fit or work better, or to organizing and aligning things for harmony. 
In Japanese, "kansou" (感想) means impression, thought, or opinion. It refers to what someone feels or thinks about a particular thing or experience
神秘的な = Shinpi-tekina = mysterious
"Ore-sama" (俺様) is a Japanese term that combines the informal pronoun "ore" (俺) meaning "I" or "me" with the respectful suffix "-sama" (様), which typically denotes high rank or status.  When used in this way, "ore-sama" is often considered arrogant or self-deprecatingly ironic, implying a sense of "my esteemed self"
In Japanese, "fragrance" can be translated as 香り (kaori) or 芳香 (hōkō). "Kaori" is more commonly used and refers to a pleasant smell or scent. "Hōkō" is another term that can be used to describe fragrance, and it is often used in the context of perfume or aromatic scents. 
In Japanese, "seikai" (正解) means "correct answer" or "the right answer". It is a noun formed from the kanji characters "sei" (正) meaning "correct" or "right" and "kai" (解) meaning "solve" or "answer". 
いつ (itsu) - when
いくら (ikura) - how much (price)
いくつ (ikutsu) - how many, how old
どこ (doko) - where
どちら (dochira) - which (of two), where (polite)
だれ (dare) - who
どなた (donata) - who (polite)
どうやって (douyatte) - how (method)
どのくらい (donokurai) - how long, how much (quantity/degree)
どんな (donna) - what kind of
どう (dou) - how (state, manner)
どうして (doushite) - why
なんで (nande) - why (more casual than doushite), what (by what means)
なぜ (naze) - why (more formal/analytical than doushite/nande)
どれ (dore) - which (of three or more)
どの (dono) - which (followed by a noun)
なに/なん (nani/nan) - what
In Japanese, "reaction" can be translated as 反応 (hannō), referring to a response or reaction, especially in a social or emotional context. It can also be translated as リアクション (riakushon), which is a loanword from English and is often used to describe reactions in a more general way, including in games and social media
The Japanese word 厳 (きび)しい (kibishii) means strict, severe, rigid, or harsh. It can describe someone's demeanor or a situation that is difficult or demanding. It can also refer to harsh natural conditions or a tough environment. 
In Japanese, "dame" (ダメ) generally means "no good," "not allowed," or "useless." It can be used to express disapproval, rejection, or to indicate that something is not permissible or acceptable. It can also be used to say "no" in informal situations. 
"Tama ni" (たまに) in Japanese means "occasionally," "sometimes," "once in a while," or "now and then." It's an adverb used to indicate that something happens infrequently. 
In Japanese, "sasuga" (さすが) translates to "as expected" or "as one would expect." It's a word used to express admiration or approval when someone or something lives up to their reputation or expectations. It implies that the person or thing has a good reputation and is doing something impressive, as expected. 
The Japanese word "tashikani" (確かに) translates to "indeed", "surely", "certainly", or "as I thought." It's a versatile expression used to agree with someone or to express that something is confirmed or as expected. 
In Japanese, "muri" (無理) means "impossible", "unreasonable," "beyond one's power," or "overburden." It's a concept also used in Toyota Production System to describe excessiveness or overworking. 
は (wa) - Marks the topic of the sentence.
が (ga) - Marks the subject of a sentence.
を (o) - Marks the direct object of a verb.
へ (he) - Indicates direction or a destination.
に (ni) - Can indicate a location, time, or the indirect object of a verb.
で (de) - Marks the location where an action takes place or the means by which an action is completed. 'With' 'From' 'Out of'
の (no) - Shows possession or describes something.
と (to) - Connects nouns in a list or is used before a direct quote.
か (ka) - Indicates a question or expresses alternatives.
も (mo) - Means "too" or "also".
から (kara) - Indicates "because of" or "since" (origin/reason).
まで (made) - Denotes a boundary or endpoint in terms of time, space, or quantity.
よ (yo) - Adds emphasis, expresses certainty, or seeks confirmation.
ね (ne) - Seeks agreement or confirmation, similar to "right?" or "isn't it?".
よね (yo ne) - A combination of yo and ne, often used for strong agreement or to confirm something with shared understanding.
さ (sa) - A casual, informal particle used for emphasis or to get attention, often indicating a pause or slight hesitation.
ぜ/ぞ (ze/zo) - Masculine, informal particles used for emphasis or to express a strong opinion/command.
わ (feminine) - A soft, feminine ending particle, often used for emphasis or to soften a statement.
けれど/けど (keredo/kedo) - Means "but" or "although".
なら (nara) - Means "if (that's the case)" or "as for".
より (yori) - Means "than" (for comparisons).
だけ (dake) - Means "only" or "just".
ぐらい/くらい (gurai/kurai) - Means "about" or "approximately".
しか (shika) - Used with a negative verb to mean "only" or "nothing but".
ばかり (bakari) - Means "only," "just," or "nothing but" (often implying excess).
って (tte) - A casual form of to iu (to say) or to iu no wa (the thing called), often used for quoting or indicating what something is called.
など (nado) - Means "and so on," "etc.," or "such as".
かどうか (ka dou ka) - Means "whether or not".
In Japanese, 研修 (kenshuu) translates to training, study, or study and training. It often refers to in-service training, induction courses, or practical learning experiences. The specific nuance can depend on the context, but it generally involves developing skills or knowledge through a structured program or experience.  研 (ken): This kanji means "to polish," "to study," or "to sharpen". 修 (shuu): This kanji means "to study," "to master," or "to修 (shū): To cultivate, to learn. Therefore, the combined meaning of 研修 (kenshuu) emphasizes the process of polishing one's skills or knowledge through study and practice
In Japanese, 現在 (genzai) primarily means "present," "now," or "current". It can also be used to refer to the "present time" or "as of" a certain point. The word is often used as a noun or adverb
粗末 (somatsu): This word is used to describe something that is simple, rough, or plain. It can also imply humble or shabby. 
粗雑 (sozatsu): This word emphasizes the lack of refinement or careful workmanship in something. 
In Japanese, a "win-win" situation is often translated as 双方(そうほう)が(が)得(とく)をする (souhou ga toku wo suru), which literally means "both sides benefit" or "both sides gain". Another common way to express this concept is 双方(そうほう)に(に)満足(まんぞく)する状況(じょうきょう) (souhou ni manzoku suru joukyou), meaning "a situation where both sides are satisfied". You can also simply use the English term "win-win" written in katakana: ウィン・ウィン (uin-uin). 
The Japanese word for "commander" can be expressed in a few ways, depending on the context. The most common translation is 指揮官 (shikikan), which specifically refers to a military commander or an officer in charge of an operation. Other options include 将 (shō), which can mean "commander" or "general
警戒 (keikai) - Vigilance/Precaution: This refers to being watchful, alert, and taking precautions against potential danger or harm. It can also be used as a verb meaning "to be vigilant" or "to watch out". 
軽快 (keikai) - Light/Nimble/Recovery: This can describe something physically light or nimble, like movements or actions. It can also refer to someone's recovery from an illness, meaning they are feeling better and their health is improving. In this context, it can also mean "light-hearted" or "cheerful"
The Japanese translation of "retreat" can vary depending on the context, but some common translations include 撤退 (てったい - tettai), 後退 (こうたい - kōtai), 退却 (たいきゃく - taikyaku), and 退く (しりぞく - shirizoku). "Tettai" and "kōtai" are often used in military contexts, meaning "withdrawal" or "retreat." "Taikyaku" is also a general term for retreat or withdrawal. "Shirizoku" can mean to retreat, withdraw, or step back. Additionally, "retreat" can also refer to a place of seclusion, which would be translated as 静養所 (せいようじょ - seiyōjo) or 隠れ家 (かくれが - kakurega). 
撤退 (tettai): This is a common term for military retreat or withdrawal, especially when referring to a strategic withdrawal from a battlefield or position, according to the Cambridge Dictionary. 
後退 (kōtai):Similar to "tettai", this also refers to a retreat or withdrawal, but can be used in more general contexts as well. 
退却 (taikyaku):This is a more general term for retreat or withdrawal, similar to "tettai" and "kōtai", according to the Collins Dictionary. 
退く (shirizoku):This verb can mean to retreat, withdraw, or step back, and can be used in various situations, not just military contexts. 
静養所 (seiyōjo):This translates to a place for recuperation or rest, similar to a retreat center. 
隠れ家 (kakurega):This means a hideaway or a place to retreat to, often for privacy or seclusion. 
In Japanese, "comms equipment" can be translated as 通信機器 (tsuushin kiki) or 通信装置 (tsuushin souchi). Both terms refer to equipment used for communication purposes, such as telephones, radios, or network devices. 通信 (tsuushin): This means "communication" or "communications".  機器 (kiki) / 装置 (souchi): Both of these mean "equipment" or "device". 装置 (souchi) can sometimes imply a more complex or sophisticated piece of equipment than 機器 (kiki). Therefore, 通信機器 (tsuushin kiki) and 通信装置 (tsuushin souchi) are the most direct translations for "comms equipment" in Japanese. 
The Japanese translation of "transmitter" is 送信機 (sōshinki). This term is commonly used in the context of broadcasting or transmitting signals, such as radio or television signals. It can also refer to a circuit or device that sends data over a medium, either wired or wireless
In Japanese, the concept of "compatibility" can be expressed in a few ways depending on the context. 相性 (aishou) is a common translation referring to compatibility between people, often implying a good relationship or a natural fit. For things like software or systems, 互換性 (gokansei) is used, meaning "interchangeability" or "compatibility". 両立 (ryouritsu) can also be used for compatibility when referring to things existing or working well together. 
相性 (aishou): This word emphasizes the natural affinity or good relationship between people. It can be used to describe compatibility in romantic relationships, friendships, or even in work environments where people get along well. 
互換性 (gokansei): This term is more focused on the technical aspect of compatibility, particularly in the context of hardware and software. It means "interchangeability" or "compatibility" in the sense that one thing can be used with another without issue. 
両立 (ryouritsu): This word implies the ability of two or more things to coexist or work together without conflict. It can be used in a variety of contexts, including situations where systems, ideas, or beliefs are compatibl
噂 (uwasa): This is the most common and direct translation for "rumor" in Japanese. 
風評 (fūhyō): This term can also be used to mean "rumor" or "reputation," but it often carries a negative connotation, implying a damaging rumor. 
流言 (ryūgen): This term refers to a rumor or a false report, emphasizing the idea of something spreading without verification. 
広言 (kōgen): This term translates to "widespread rumor" or "public talk," and it often suggests a rumor that is widely circulated
In Japanese, the term "sitrep" (situation report) can be translated in several ways depending on the specific context. The most common and direct translation is 状況 (jōkyō), which means "situation," "state," or "condition". Other possible translations include 様子 (yōsu), which can refer to the appearance or state of something, and 状態 (jōtai), which also means "condition". 
状況 (jōkyō): This is the most versatile and widely used term for "situation" in Japanese.
様子 (yōsu): This term can be used when describing the appearance or state of something, like checking on how someone is doing.
状態 (jōtai): This term focuses more on the condition or state of something, similar to "condition" in English.
In Japanese, 間違い (machigai) translates to "mistake" or "error". It can also refer to a misunderstanding, misconception, or even a mishap
In Japanese, "purification" can be translated as 浄化 (jouka) or 清め (kiyome), depending on the context. Jouka (浄化) is a more general term for purification, while Kiyome (清め) often refers to ritualistic or spiritual purification. Another term, misogi (禊), specifically refers to ritual purification by washing with water, often in a Shinto context. 
Jouka (浄化):This is the most common translation for "purification" and can be used in various contexts, such as water purification or political purification. 
Kiyome (清め): This term emphasizes a more spiritual or ritualistic cleansing, often associated with religious practices like Shinto. 
Misogi (禊): This refers to the specific Shinto practice of ritual purification by washing with water. It's often used in conjunction with harae (祓), which is another Shinto purification ritual. Together, they are sometimes referred to as misogiharae (禊祓
爆発物 = Bakuhatsu-mono = explosives
The Japanese translation of "authorization" is 許可 (kyoka) or 認可 (ninka). Both terms generally refer to the act of giving permission or approval for something. "Kyoka" is a more common and general term for permission, while "ninka" often implies a formal or official approval. 
許可 (kyoka): This is the most common and versatile way to say "authorization" or "permission" in Japanese. It can be used in a wide range of contexts.
認可 (ninka): This term often implies a more official or formal authorization, like a government approval or a company's official sanction.
In Japanese, 目的 (mokuteki) translates to purpose, aim, goal, objective, or intention. It represents the reason for doing something or the desired outcome
In Japanese, the word "supplies" can be translated in several ways depending on the context. Common translations include 用品 (yōhin), which refers to general supplies, 供給 (kyōkyū), which means to supply or provision, or 貯蔵品 (chozōhin), which refers to stored supplies. For specific types of supplies, you can use terms like 事務用品 (jimuyōhin) for office supplies, 学用品 (gakuyōhin) for school supplies, or 消耗品 (shōmōhin) for consumables. 
* 用品 (yōhin): This is a general term for supplies, similar to the English "supplies".   
* 供給 (kyōkyū): This term refers to the act of supplying or providing something, and can be used as a verb or noun.   
* 貯蔵品 (chozōhin): This term refers to stored supplies or provisions.   
* 事務用品 (jimuyōhin): This translates to "office supplies".   
* 学用品 (gakuyōhin): This translates to "school supplies".   
* 消耗品 (shōmōhin): This translates to "consumables" or items that are used up. 
In Japanese, 戦 (sen) means "battle" or "fight," and 闘 (tō) means "fight" or "combat." The combination 戦闘 (sentō) directly translates to "fighting" or "battle." It can also refer to the act of fighting itself, as in the verb 戦闘する (sentō suru), meaning "to fight" or "to battle". 
In Japanese, 夕焼け (yuuyake) or ゆうやけ directly translates to "sunset" or "evening glow". It specifically refers to the warm, reddish light you see in the sky during sunset. It can also be used to describe the afterglow of a sunset. Here's a breakdown: 夕 (yuu): Evening or dusk. 焼け (yake): Burn or glow. Therefore, 夕焼け (yuuyake) literally means "evening glow" or "sunset glow
任務 = にんむ = Ninmu = Mission; Assignment; Task
失う = うしなう = Ushinau = To lose (something); To part with
昔 = むかし = Mukashi = In the past; Formerly; Long ago
昔のように = むかしのように = Mukashi no you ni = Like in the past; As in old times
証拠 = しょうこ = Shouko = Evidence; Proof
移民 = いみん = Imin = Immigrant; Emigrant
不法移民 = ふほういみん = Fuhou Imin = Illegal immigrant
上回 = じょうかい = Joukai = To exceed; To surpass; To be above
暗号化 = あんごうか = Angouka = Encryption; Encipherment
暗号文 = あんごうぶん = Angoubūn = Encrypted message; Ciphertext
監視 = かんし = Kanshi = Surveillance; Monitoring; Observation
最終化 = さいしゅうか = Saishūka = Finalization; Bringing to completion
座標 = ざひょう = Zahyō = Coordinates (e.g., in mathematics or mapping)
撤回 = てっかい = Tekkai = Withdrawal; Retraction; Revocation
準備 = じゅんび = Junbi = Preparation; Arrangement; Provision
哲学 = てつがく = Tetsugaku = Philosophy
緊急放送 = きんきゅうほうそう = Kinkyuu Housou = Emergency broadcast
窮地 = きゅうち = Kyuuchi = Predicament; Dilemma; Critical situation
旧知 = きゅうち = Kyūchi = Old acquaintance; Old friend
国家安全保障 = こっかあんぜんほしょう = Kokka Anzen Hoshou = National security
過失 = かしつ = Kashitsu = Fault; Mistake; Error; Negligence
ご覧の通り = ごらんのとおり = Goran no Toori = As you can see; As you know; As per your observation
責任 = せきにん = Sekinin = Responsibility; Duty; Obligation
貴様 = きさま = Kisama = You (A highly contemptuous, rude, or aggressive way to say "you." Should only be used to show extreme anger or disdain for someone, or by a superior to an inferior in a very harsh manner.)
報告書 = ほうこくしょ = Houkokusho = Report; Written report
最善の選択 = さいぜんのせんたく = Saizen no Sentaku = Most ideal choice; Best choice
過ぎ = すぎ = Sugi = Past; After; Too much (can indicate excessiveness) This word is often used as a suffix to indicate something has passed, or that something is "too much" or "excessive" (e.g., 食べ過ぎ - tabe-sugi = eating too much).
ずっと = Zutto = All the time; Continuously; For a long time; By far (to a great degree)
底なしの淵 = そこなしのふち = Sokonashi no Fuchi = Bottomless abyss - 底なし (Sokonashi): This literally means "without a bottom" or "bottomless."底 (soko): Refers to the bottom, base, or depths.なし (nashi): Means "without" or "lacking."の (no): This is a possessive particle, similar to "'s" or "of" in English. It connects "bottomless" to "abyss."淵 (Fuchi): This word signifies an abyss, a deep pool, a deep part of a river, or a chasm. It conveys a sense of great depth and often, mystery or danger.Together, 底なしの淵 (sokonashi no fuchi) paints a vivid picture of an immeasurably deep, dark, and unending chasm. It's often used metaphorically to describe a hopeless situation or an inescapable predicament, much like its English counterpart.
糞 = くそ = Kuso = Shit; Damn; Feces
方針 = ほうしん = Hōshin = Policy; Plan; Principle; Course of action; Aim
当たり前でしょう = あたりまえでしょう = Atarimae deshou = It's obvious, isn't it? / That's a given, isn't it?
見るからに = みるからに = Miru kara ni = From its appearance; Judging from its looks; Obviously (from sight)
成功 = せいこう = Seikō = Success; Achievement
外出禁止令 = がいしゅつきんしれい = Gaishutsu Kinshirei = Lockdown; Stay-at-home order
構して見ている = こうしてみている = Kōshite mite iru = I'm watching to see what happens / I'm observing the situation with a posture or intention.
構して (Kōshite): This is the te-form of the verb 構える (kamaeru), which means:To assume a posture/stance: Like getting ready for a fight, taking aim, or setting oneself.To set up/prepare: To arrange or establish something.To intend/plan: To have a specific intention or purpose.In this context, it suggests a deliberate "posture" or "stance" in preparation for observation. It implies readiness or a specific mindset while watching.
見ている (Mite iru): This is the te-form of the verb 見る (miru) (to see/watch) combined with いる (iru) (to be/exist), indicating an ongoing action or a continuous state of watching/observing.
そろそろ = Soro Soro = It's about time; Soon; Gradually; Presently.
星々 = ほしぼし = Hoshiboshi = Stars (plural); Many stars
分析 = ぶんせき = Bunseki = Analysis
状況 = じょうきょう = Joukyou = Situation; State of affairs; Circumstances
もう一度お願いします = もういちどおねがいします = Mou ichido onegai shimasu = Please say that one more time. / Please repeat that.
調子 = ちょうし = Chōshi = Condition; State (of health, machine, etc.); Mood; Rhythm.
こっそり = kossori = secretly
隠す = kakusu = to hide/conceal
ほっとした = hotto shita = That's a relief.
伝統 = dentou = traditions
伝統通り = dentou doori = as per tradition; according to tradition  - This is a very direct and common way to say "as is tradition" or "in the traditional way."
しきたり通り = shikitari doori = as per custom; according to custom - This is similar to 伝統通り but emphasizes established customs or practices, which can be a bit broader than formal "traditions."
健康 = けんこう = kenkou = health
健康状態 = けんこうじょうたい = kenkoujoutai = state of health; physical condition
体調 = たいちょう = taichou = physical condition (often referring to one's personal condition, like "how I'm feeling physically") The kanji 体 (tai) means "body." The kanji 調 (chou) means "condition" or "state."
隊長 = たいちょう = taichou = captain; commander; leader (of a unit/squad/team) The kanji 隊 (tai) means "squad," "unit," or "team."The kanji 長 (chou) means "leader" or "chief."
解除済 = かいじょずみ = kaijozumi = deactivated
堕落する = だらくする = daraku suru = to degenerate; to fall into corruption/degradation; to deprave - This word often carries a strong moral or ethical connotation, referring to a decline in character, morals, or societal standards. It can also be used for a person who has become morally corrupt.
退廃する = たいはいする = taihai suru = to degenerate; to decay; to become decadent - This term is often used to describe the decline of a culture, society, or art form, implying a loss of vigor, vitality, and often leading to decadence. It can also refer to a person who is decadent.
罠 = わな = wana = trap; snare; pitfall
情報 = じょうほう = jouhou = information
警戒 = けいかい = keikai = alert; vigilance; caution; warning - This is a common term for being on guard, watchful, or having a general sense of alert against potential danger. It can also refer to a warning itself.
警報 = けいほう = keihou = alarm; warning; alert (often a siren or specific signal) - This refers to an actual alarm or a formal warning, often in the context of an emergency (e.g., a disaster warning).
反射神経 = はんしゃしんけい = hanshashinkei = reflexes
探す = さがす = sagasu = to search; to look for (verb)
検索 = けんさく = kensaku = search (noun, often used for digital searches)
どうしましょう = Dou shimashou = What should I do? / What shall we do?
援護 = えんご = engo = cover; support; reinforcement; backup - This term is used when referring to providing support or cover, often in a protective or military context.
予備 = よび = yobi = reserve; spare; backup (as in a spare part or extra supply) - This refers to something kept in reserve for future use or as a replacement if the primary item fails.
バックアップ = ばっくあっぷ = bakkuappu = backup (more universally recgonized, easier to remember)
自信を持つ = じしんをもつ = jishin o motsu = believe in yourself (literally: "have confidence") - This is the most direct and common way to say "believe in yourself" in Japanese, focusing on having self-confidence.
自分を信じるな = じぶんをしんじるな = jibun o shinjiru na = Don't believe in yourself. - 自分 (jibun): oneself - を (o): particle indicating the direct object - 信じる (shinjiru): to believe - な (na): particle indicating a strong negative command/prohibition 
俺を信じろ = おれをしんじろ = ore o shinjiro = Believe in me. - 俺 (ore): a masculine, informal way to say "I" or "me." - を (o): particle - 信じろ (shinjiro): informal, strong command form of "to believe" 
お前を信じる俺を = おまえをしんじるおれを = omae o shinjiru ore o = me, who believes in you. - お前 (omae): a familiar/informal (and sometimes rough) way to say "you." - を (o): particle - 信じる (shinjiru): to believe (here, acting as a modifier for "俺") - 俺を (ore o): "me" (as in, "believe me [who believes in you]")
自分を信じるな、俺を信じろ、お前を信じる俺を。 = Jibun o shinjiru na, ore o shinjiro, omae o shinjiru ore o. = Don't believe in yourself, believe in me, who believes in you.
Serious = 本気 = ほんき = honki
真剣 = しんけん = shinken = serious; earnest; genuine; real sword
宇宙船 = うちゅうせん = uchuusen = spaceship
なぞなぞ = なぞなぞ = nazonazo = riddle
完全 = かんぜん = kanzen = complete; perfect; entire; flawless
改善 = かいぜん = kaizen = improvement; continuous improvement - In a business context, particularly stemming from Japanese management philosophies like the Toyota Production System, "Kaizen" specifically refers to the philosophy or practice of continuous improvement, often involving small, incremental changes made by everyone in an organization to improve processes, products, and services.
隊 = たい = tai = squad; unit; corps; party - This kanji is commonly used as a suffix or part of a compound word to denote a group or unit, especially in military, police, or rescue contexts (e.g., 救助隊 - kyuujotai - resque squad)
連携攻撃 = れんけいこうげき = renkei kougeki = coordinated attack; joint attack - 連携 (renkei): cooperation; coordination; linkage 攻撃 (kougeki): attack; strike; assault
協同攻撃 = きょうどうこうげき = kyoudou kougeki = joint attack; combined attack; coordinated attack 協同 (kyoudou): cooperation; collaboration; working together 攻撃 (kougeki): attack; strike; assault
組織的攻撃 = そしきてきこうげき = soshikiteki kougeki = organized attack; systematic attack 組織的 (soshikiteki): organized; systematic 攻撃 (kougeki): attack; strike; assault
仇討ち = あだうち = adauchi = revenge (especially for a wrong done to one's family/lord, more historical/feudal)
復讐 = ふくしゅう = fukushuu = revenge; vengeance (more general, modern use)
キノコ = きのこ = kinoko = mushroom (general term) This is the most common and widely used word for "mushroom" in general, whether you're talking about them in a forest, at a grocery store, or in a dish. It's often written in Katakana (キノコ) or Hiragana (きのこ), though the Kanji 茸 also exists.
茸 = たけ = take = mushroom (often used in names of specific mushrooms) While the Kanji 茸 can be read as "kinoko," it's more commonly pronounced "take" when it's part of the name of a specific type of mushroom, like:
椎茸 = しいたけ = shiitake = shiitake mushroom (probably the most famous Japanese mushroom!)
冗談 = じょうだん = jōdan = joke
からかう = からかう = karakau = to tease
つまり = つまり = tsumari = in short, in other words, that is to say - Tsumari is a useful Japanese conjunction or adverb that signals you're about to summarize, conclude, or clarify something. It's similar to phrases like "in other words," "that is to say," "in short," or "ultimately" in English.
流石 = さすが = sasuga = as expected, indeed, even (someone as great as) - Sasuga is a versatile and often complimentary Japanese word that conveys a sense of admiration or recognition for something or someone living up to expectations. It's used when an outcome or action is just as good, impressive, or typical as you thought it would be.
確かに = たしかに = tashikani = certainly, surely, indeed, if I'm not mistaken - Tashikani is a very common and versatile Japanese adverb. It's used to express agreement, confirmation, or a sense of certainty. Here's a breakdown of its nuances:
資格 = しかく = shikaku = qualification, eligibility, license - Shikaku is a versatile Japanese word that refers to a qualification, eligibility, or license. It's commonly used in various contexts, such as:
登録する = とうろくする = tōroku suru = to register, to enroll, to sign up
監視する = かんしする = kanshi suru = to monitor, to watch, to supervise - Kanshi suru means to monitor, to watch, or to supervise something or someone, often with the intent of keeping an eye on a situation, ensuring compliance, or detecting problems.
死傷者 = ししょうしゃ = shishousha = casualties (literally "dead and injured persons")
犠牲者 = ぎせいしゃ = giseisha = victims; casualties (especially those who died)
死者 = ししゃ = shisha = the dead; fatalities
負傷者 = ふしょうしゃ = fushousha = the injured; wounded persons
刺す = さす = sasu = to stab; to pierce; to sting; to bite (insect)
指す = さす = sasu = to point; to indicate; to show
差す = さす = sasu = to stretch out (a hand); to open (an umbrella); to shine (sun); to pour (liquid); to be in bloom (flowers); to begin to (e.g., rain)
増援する = ぞうえんする = zouen suru = to reinforce (with troops/aid); to send reinforcements - This specifically refers to sending additional personnel, troops, or aid to strengthen a force or position.
強化する = きょうかする = kyouka suru = to strengthen; to enhance; to reinforce - This is a broader term that can apply to strengthening physical objects, but also to strengthening capabilities, systems, or relationships.
補強する = ほきょうする = hokyou suru = to reinforce; to strengthen; to brace - This is commonly used for physically reinforcing structures, buildings, or positions to make them stronger and more secure.
お人好し = おひとよし = ohitoyoshi = good-natured person (often to a fault); gullible person; pushover - This is a very common term for someone who is kind-hearted and well-meaning, but to such an extent that they are easily taken advantage of, cheated, or become a "pushover." It can carry a slightly negative or pitying connotation.
言いなり = いいなり = iinari = someone who obeys readily; submissive person; pushover (literally: "as one is told") - This refers to someone who does whatever they are told without objection, implying they are easily controlled or dominated. You often use it with a verb like になる (ni naru - to become) or にする (ni suru - to make someone). - Example: 彼は彼女の言いなりだ (Kare wa kanojo no iinari da) = He's her pushover / He does whatever she says.
カモ = kamo = sucker; easy mark; pushover (slang, literally "duck") - This is a more informal and derogatory slang term, similar to calling someone a "sucker" or "easy prey." It's derived from the idea of hunting a duck.
つまり = tsumari = in short; in brief; in a word; to sum up; that is to say  - Summarize what has been said. - Rephrase something in a simpler way. - Clarify a point. - Draw a conclusion from previous statements.
救急箱 = きゅうきゅうばこ = kyūkyūbako = first-aid kit, emergency kit
勘弁してください = かんべんしてください = kanben shite kudasai = Please forgive me / Please bear with me / Please let me off the hook
旅人 = たびびと = tabibito = traveler, journeyer, wayfarer - Tabibito refers to a traveler, journeyer, or wayfarer. It evokes a sense of someone who is on a journey, often implying a somewhat continuous or significant journey rather than just a quick trip. It can carry a slightly romantic or poetic nuance compared to just saying "tourist" (観光客 - kankōkyaku).
報告 (hōkoku): Report, notification.
Here's "ammunition" in Japanese:
弾薬 = だんやく = dan'yaku = ammunition, ordnance - Dan'yaku is the standard and most common term for ammunition in Japanese, referring to bullets, shells, cartridges, and other projectiles used with firearms or artillery.
通信 = つうしん = tsūshin = telecommunications, correspondence, transmission of information - Tsūshin refers more specifically to the technical aspect of sending and receiving information, often via electronic means. This is the term you'd use for telecommunications, internet communication, radio communication, or correspondence.
通信システム (tsūshin shisutemu) = communications system
携帯通信 (keitai tsūshin) = mobile communications
状態 = じょうたい = jōtai = condition, state, status, situation - Jōtai is a common and versatile noun that refers to the condition, state, status, or situation of something or someone. It describes how something is at a particular moment.
健康状態 (kenkō jōtai) = health condition/state
状況状態 (jōkyō jōtai) = current situation/state
バッテリーの状態 (batterī no jōtai) = battery status/condition
緊急状態 (kinkyū jōtai) = emergency state/situation
伝送 = でんそう = densō = transmission (of data, signals, electricity) - This term is primarily used for the transmission of data, signals, electricity, or information through a medium (like wires, airwaves, fiber optics). It's very common in technology and telecommunications.
Example: データ伝送 (dēta densō) = data transmission
Example: 無線伝送 (musen densō) = wireless transmission
送信 = そうしん = sōshin = transmission, sending (of messages, faxes, emails) - Sōshin specifically refers to the act of sending a message, email, fax, or other data. It's about initiating the transmission from the sender's side. - Example: メールを送信する (mēru o sōshin suru) = to send an email / to transmit an email
ご留意 = ごりゅうい = goryūi = to pay attention, to take notice, to bear in mind (polite)
誤謬 = ごびゅう = gobyū = error, fallacy, mistake (more formal/technical) - This refers to an error, mistake, or fallacy. It's a more formal or technical term often used in academic, legal, or logical contexts.
警戒 = けいかい = keikai = caution, vigilance, warning, lookout - Keikai is a common noun and verb (when used with する - suru) that refers to caution, vigilance, being on guard, or a warning state. It implies a readiness to respond to potential danger or a careful watch over something.
警戒警報 (keikai keihō) = warning alarm
警戒レベル (keikai reberu) = alert/warning level
警戒する (keikai suru) = to be cautious/vigilant, to be on guard
夜間警戒 (yakan keikai) = night watch/vigilance
貰いたい = もらいたい = moraitai = want to receive / want you to do (for me) - Moraitai is the -tai form (desire form) of the verb 貰う (morau). 
貰う (morau) is a verb that means: To receive (from someone of equal or lower status, or when focusing on the giver's action). To have someone do something for you (as a favor). This is a key usage in Japanese, where the action is performed for the speaker's benefit.
Example: プレゼントを貰いたい。(Purezento o moraitai.) = I want to receive a present.
Example: お金が貰いたい。(Okane ga moraitai.) = I want to receive money.
Example: 手伝って貰いたい。(Tetsudatte moraitai.) = I want you to help me. (Literally: "I want to receive the favor of you helping.")
Example: 教えて貰いたい。(Oshiete moraitai.) = I want you to teach me.
欠落 = けつらく = ketsuraku = lack, absence, defection, omission - Ketsuraku refers to a lack, absence, defect, or omission of something that should be present. It implies that a necessary or expected part is missing.
データの欠落 (dēta no ketsuraku) = missing data / data loss
記憶の欠落 (kioku no ketsuraku) = memory loss / gap in memory
重要な要素の欠落 (jūyō na yōso no ketsuraku) = lack/absence of a crucial element
人格の欠落 (jinkaku no ketsuraku) = deficiency in character (a negative connotation, implying a missing moral aspect)
悪趣味 = あくしゅみ = akushumi = bad taste; poor taste; vulgar taste - This is the direct translation for "bad taste" in an aesthetic sense, referring to lack of style, being tacky, or having vulgar preferences.
ダサい = dasai = uncool; lame; unfashionable; tacky (colloquial) - This is a very common and informal term used to describe something or someone that is unfashionable, uncool, or has "bad taste" in a style sense.
確認済み = かくにんずみ = kakunin-zumi = confirmed, verified (already confirmed) - This is a very common and direct translation, especially in a business or technical context. It literally means "already confirmed" or "confirmation complete."確認 (kakunin): confirmation, verification - 済み (-zumi): a suffix indicating that something has been completed or finished.
Example: 予約は確認済みです。(Yoyaku wa kakunin-zumi desu.) = The reservation is confirmed.
Example: データが確認済みかチェックする。(Dēta ga kakunin-zumi ka chekku suru.) = Check if the data is confirmed.
確定済み = かくていずみ = kakutei-zumi = finalized, determined, confirmed (with finality) - Similar to kakunin-zumi, but kakutei-zumi carries a stronger nuance of something being finalized, definitively decided, or irrevocably confirmed. It implies that there won't be any changes.確定 (kakutei): decision, settlement, finalization. - Example: 日程は確定済みです。(Nittei wa kakutei-zumi desu.) = The schedule is confirmed/finalized.
承認済み = しょうにんずみ = shōnin-zumi = approved, authorized, confirmed (with approval) - This term means "approved" or "authorized." If "confirmed" implies that something has been given official approval, this is the appropriate word.承認 (shōnin): approval, authorization, recognition. - Example: 提案は承認済みです。(Teian wa shōnin-zumi desu.) = The proposal is approved/confirmed.
士気 = しき = shiki = morale - This is the most direct and common translation for "morale," especially in contexts like military, sports teams, or companies. It refers to the collective spirit, enthusiasm, and confidence of a group.
やる気 = やるき = yaruki = motivation; willingness to do; drive; morale (informal) - While it primarily means "motivation" or "will to do something," "やる気がある (yaruki ga aru - to be motivated)" or "やる気がない (yaruki ga nai - to lack motivation)" can certainly reflect the state of one's morale. It's often used for individuals or smaller groups in an informal context.
意気込み = いきごみ = ikigomi = enthusiasm; spirit; zeal; morale - This refers to one's eagerness or readiness to do something with enthusiasm, which is closely related to morale.
救世主 = きゅうせいしゅ = kyuuseishu = savior; messiah - This term is often used for a "savior" in a broader, more impactful sense, akin to a messiah or a redeemer who saves a group, nation, or even humanity from a difficult situation.
引き出す = ひきだす = hikidasu = to withdraw (money), to pull out, to extract - This is the most common verb for withdrawing money from a bank account or ATM. It can also mean to pull something out or extract it.
Example: 銀行からお金を引き出す。(Ginkō kara okane o hikidasu.) = To withdraw money from the bank.
Example: ATMで現金を引き出す。(ATM de genkin o hikidasu.) = To withdraw cash at an ATM.
撤退する = てったいする = tettai suru = to withdraw (troops, from a position), to retreat, to pull out - This term is used for withdrawing troops, forces, or personnel from a location or operation. It implies a strategic retreat or pulling out. It can also be used in business for withdrawing from a market or project.
Example: 軍隊を撤退する。(Guntai o tettai suru.) = To withdraw troops.
Example: 市場から撤退する。(Shijō kara tettai suru.) = To withdraw from the market.
撤回する = てっかいする = tekkai suru = to withdraw (a statement, offer, proposal), to retract, to revoke - This verb means to withdraw or retract a statement, offer, proposal, decision, or promise. It implies taking back something that was previously put forward.
Example: 発言を撤回する。(Hatsugen o tekkai suru.) = To withdraw a statement.
Example: 提案を撤回する。(Teian o tekkai suru.) = To withdraw a proposal.
辞退する = じたいする = jitai suru = to withdraw (from an offer, position, or competition), to decline, to refuse - Jitai suru is used when someone withdraws from an offer, a position (like a job offer), an invitation, or a competition. It implies declining or politely refusing to participate or accept.
Example: 立候補を辞退する。(Rikkōho o jitai suru.) = To withdraw one's candidacy.
Example: 申し出を辞退する。(Mōshide o jitai suru.) = To decline/withdraw from an offer.
引きこもる = ひきこもる = hikikomoru = to withdraw (socially), to seclude oneself, to stay indoors - This verb describes the act of socially withdrawing or secluding oneself from society, often staying at home for prolonged periods. This is the origin of the term "hikikomori."
Example: 彼は部屋に引きこもっている。(Kare wa heya ni hikikomotte iru.) = He is withdrawn/secluded in his room.
塔 = とう = tō = tower, pagoda, stupa - This is the most general and widely used term for "tower." It refers to a tall, slender structure. It's often used for traditional Japanese and Asian pagodas, as well as general towers.
Example: 五重の塔 (gojū no tō) = five-storied pagoda.
Example: 時計塔 (tokeitō) = clock tower.
Example: テレビ塔 (terebitō) = TV tower.
役に立つ = やくにたつ = yaku ni tatsu = to be helpful, to be useful, to be of use - This is the most common and direct way to say "to be helpful" or "to be useful." It describes something (or someone) that serves a purpose or provides assistance.
Example: この情報は役に立つ。(Kono jōhō wa yaku ni tatsu.) = This information is helpful/useful.
Example: 彼はいつも役に立つことをしてくれる。(Kare wa itsumo yaku ni tatsu koto o shite kureru.) = He always does helpful things for me.
助けになる = たすけになる = tasuke ni naru = to be a help, to be helpful, to provide assistance - This phrase emphasizes providing direct assistance or support to someone in need. It's more about "being a help" to someone.
Example: あなたの助言はとても助けになった。(Anata no jogen wa totemo tasuke ni natta.) = Your advice was very helpful.
Example: 困っている人を助けになる。(Komatte iru hito o tasuke ni naru.) = To be helpful to people in need.
親切な = しんせつな = shinsetsu na = kind, considerate, helpful (describing a person's nature) - This is an adjective that describes a person's kind, considerate, or benevolent nature. While it doesn't directly mean "helpful," someone who is shinsetsu is inherently helpful.- It's an adjective that takes 「な (na)」 when directly modifying a noun.
Example: 親切な人 (shinsetsu na hito) = a kind/helpful person.
Example: 彼女は親切に教えてくれた。(Kanojo wa shinsetsu ni oshiete kureta.) = She kindly/helpfully taught me.
利点 = りてん = riten = advantage, merit, strong point, benefit - This is a very common and general term for "advantage" or "merit." It refers to a positive point, a benefit, or a favorable aspect of something, often when comparing it to something else.
Example: この製品の利点は何か？ (Kono seihin no riten wa nanika?) = What are the advantages of this product?
Example: それぞれの利点を比較する。(Sorezore no riten o hikaku suru.) = To compare each advantage.
災害 = さいがい = saigai = disaster; calamity; catastrophe - This is the most general and widely used term for natural disasters (earthquakes, typhoons, floods, etc.) and large-scale man-made disasters.
惨事 = さんじ = sanji = tragic accident; disaster; calamity; tragic event - This term often implies a more tragic or disastrous event, often involving many casualties or severe consequences, like a major accident or a devastating incident.
厄災 = やくさい = yakusai = calamity; disaster; misfortune -  This term often has a slightly more archaic or literary feel, referring to a great misfortune or disaster that befalls someone or a group.
災難 = さいなん = sainan = misfortune; calamity; disaster; trouble - This term can be used for both large-scale disasters and more personal misfortunes or troubles.
災い いつか = わざわい いつか = wazawai itsuka = Calamity someday / Disaster sometime - 災い (wazawai): calamity; disaster; misfortune; evil - いつか (itsuka): someday; sometime; one day (in the future, or in the past, depending on context, but usually future here) - This phrase suggests that a disaster or misfortune will occur at some point in the future.
戦争 = せんそう = sensou = war; warfare; battle
先ほど = さきほど = sakihodo = a while ago; a moment ago; a little while back; earlier - This term refers to a very recent past, usually within the same day or just a few hours prior. It's generally a polite way to say "just a moment ago.
二日酔い = ふつかよい = futsukayoi = hangover
戦争 = せんそう = sensō = war, warfare - Sensō is the most common and comprehensive term for war or warfare. It refers to a large-scale, prolonged armed conflict between states or organized groups. It implies a state of hostilities, typically involving political objectives, national forces, and a broader strategic context. - Refers to the overarching, large-scale conflict. Implies a formal state of hostilities between major entities. Used for historical wars or ongoing international conflicts.
第二次世界戦争 (Dainiji Sekai Sensō) World War II
戦争が始まる (sensō ga hajimaru) War begins.
戦争状態にある (sensō jōtai ni aru) To be in a state of war.
戦闘 = せんとう = sentō = battle, combat, fighting, engagement - Sentō refers to a battle or combat, which is a direct armed engagement or encounter between opposing forces. It's a specific event or series of events that occur within a larger war, or sometimes a standalone military confrontation. It focuses on the actual act of fighting or combat. It is more formal and military-specific than tatakai. - Refers to a specific armed clash or engagement. Often occurs as part of a larger sensō. Used in military contexts to describe direct fighting.
激しい戦闘が続いている (Hageshii sentō ga tsuzuite iru) Fierce combat is continuing.
市街地戦闘 (shigai-chi sentō) Urban combat / street fighting.
戦闘機 (sentōki) Fighter plane (a plane designed for combat).
戦い = たたかい = tatakai = fight, struggle, battle, contest, competition - Tatakai is the most versatile and general term. It is the noun form of the verb 戦う (tatakau - to fight). It can encompass both physical confrontations and abstract struggles, as well as competitions or contests. Most general term for "fight," "struggle," or "battle." Can refer to a literal physical battle (less formal than sentō). Commonly used for non-military struggles (e.g., against disease, poverty).Also used for competitions or contests.
病気との戦い (byōki to no tatakai) A struggle against illness.
激しい戦いだった (Hageshii tatakai datta) It was a fierce fight/battle/struggle.
選挙の戦い (senkyo no tatakai) An election contest/fight.
これから = これから = kore kara = from now on, from this point forward, after this, soon - Kore kara is a versatile Japanese phrase that literally means "from this (ko) point (re) onward (kara)." It refers to a point in time starting from the present moment and moving into the future.
Example: これから頑張ります。(Kore kara ganbarimasu.) = I'll do my best from now on.
Example: これから気をつけます。(Kore kara ki o tsukemasu.) = I'll be careful from this point forward.
Example: これから会議が始まります。(Kore kara kaigi ga hajimarimasu.) = The meeting will begin after this / soon.
Example: 食事のこれからどうしますか？ (Shokuji no kore kara dō shimasu ka?) = What will we do after dinner?
Soon/In a moment: In some contexts, it can imply that something is about to happen very shortly.
Example: これから出かけます。(Kore kara dekakemasu.) = I'm leaving soon / in a moment.
Example: これからが本番だ。(Kore kara ga honban da.) = The main event starts from now.
それから = それから = sore kara = after that, then, and then, and, also, besides - Sore kara is a highly versatile and frequently used Japanese conjunction and adverb. It literally means "from that point" or "from then." Its main functions are to connect actions or events in sequence, to list additional items, or to introduce a new topic. - "After that" / "Then" / "And then" (Sequential actions/events): - This is one of its most common uses, indicating a chronological progression of events.
Example: 宿題をしました。それから、テレビを見ました。 (Shukudai o shimashita. Sore kara, terebi o mimashita.) I did my homework. After that/Then, I watched TV.
Example: まずご飯を食べて、それから出かけよう。 (Mazu gohan o tabete, sore kara dekakeyou.) First, let's eat, and then let's go out.
Example: りんご、みかん、それからバナナを買った。 (Ringo, mikan, sore kara banana o katta.) I bought apples, oranges, and bananas. - It can be used to add items to a list of nouns or clauses, much like "and" or "also" in English. It implies that the items are of a similar nature or category. - "And" / "Also" / "Besides" (Adding items to a list):
Example: 彼は歌も上手だ。それから、料理も得意だ。 (Kare wa uta mo jōzu da. Sore kara, ryōri mo tokui da.) He's good at singing. Also/Besides, he's good at cooking.
Example: 「今日の予定は？」「午前中は会議。それから？」 ("Kyō no yotei wa?" "Gozenchū wa kaigi. Sore kara?") "What's the plan for today?" "A meeting in the morning. And then?" - In conversation, it can be used to shift to a new but related topic, or to ask "what else?" or "what then?".
魔法 = まほう = mahō = magic, sorcery, witchcraft - Mahō is the most common and direct translation for "magic," "sorcery," or "witchcraft" in Japanese. It generally refers to supernatural powers or the art of using such powers, often associated with fantasy, fairy tales, or fictional contexts. - Fantasy and Fiction: Most frequently used in stories, games, anime, and manga involving wizards, witches, spells, and supernatural abilities.
Example: 魔法使い (mahōtsukai) Magic-user / Wizard / Sorcerer / Witch.
Example: 魔法の杖 (mahō no tsue) Magic wand.
Example: 空飛ぶ魔法の絨毯 (soratobu mahō no jūtan) A flying magic carpet. 
Example: まるで魔法のようだ。(Marude mahō no yō da.) It's just like magic.
魔術 (Majutsu): Often also translated as "magic" or "sorcery." While very similar to mahō, majutsu can sometimes carry a slightly more academic, ritualistic, or technical connotation of magic as a learned art or technique, whereas mahō can feel a bit more whimsical or inherent. However, in many contexts, they are interchangeable.
Example: 黒魔術 (kuro majutsu) Black magic.
手品 (Tejina): This refers specifically to magic tricks or sleight of hand, as performed by a magician for entertainment. It's about illusion, not actual supernatural power.
Example: 手品師 (tejinashi) Magician (one who performs tricks).
妖術 (Yōjutsu): A more archaic term for "sorcery" or "witchcraft," often associated with evil spirits or supernatural beings.
奇術 (Kijutsu): Another term for "magic tricks" or "conjuring," similar to tejina.
元首 = げんしゅ = genshu = head of state, sovereign, ruler - Genshu refers to the head of state, sovereign, or ruler of a country. This is a formal and political term, indicating the highest leader of a nation. - Refers to the supreme leader of a country, regardless of whether they are a monarch, president, or prime minister.
楽園 = らくえん = rakuen = paradise, pleasure garden, Eden - Rakuen is a native Japanese term for "paradise." It also refers to a blissful or ideal place, often with a connotation of a "pleasure garden" or a state of complete happiness and absence of suffering. It carries a slightly more classical or literary feel than paradaisu, and is frequently used for  - Religious or mythical paradises: Like the Garden of Eden (エデンの楽園 - Eden no Rakuen). - Idealistic or utopian settings. 
時計回り = とけいまわり = tokei-mawari = clockwise, clockwise rotation
反時計回り = はんとけいまわり = han-tokei-mawari = counterclockwise, anti-clockwise, counterclockwise rotation
壊れた = こわれた = kowareta = broken, out of order, damaged (adjective form, past tense of "to break") - Kowareta is the past tense form of the verb 壊れる (kowareru - to break, to get broken), and it functions as an adjective meaning "broken," "out of order," or "damaged." It is the most common and versatile way to describe something that is no longer in working condition or has been physically damaged. - Describes the state of being broken: Used for objects, machines, appliances, electronics, etc.
Example: 壊れた時計 (kowareta tokei) A broken clock/watch.
Example: 電話が壊れている。 (Denwa ga kowarete iru.) The phone is broken (present continuous state of being broken).
Example: このコピー機は壊れています。 (Kono kopīki wa kowarete imasu.) This copier is out of order.
壊す (Kowasu): The transitive verb meaning "to break (something)," "to destroy." (e.g., お皿を壊した - osara o kowashita - I broke the plate.)
故障 (Koshō): A noun meaning "breakdown," "malfunction," "fault." Often used for mechanical or electrical issues.
Example: 機械が故障した。 (Kikai ga koshō shita.) The machine broke down/malfunctioned.
破損した (Hason shita): More formal. Adjective form meaning "damaged," "broken" (often referring to documents, goods in transit, or property where the damage might not render it completely unusable but affects its integrity).
Example: 破損した商品 (hason shita shōhin) Damaged goods.
折れた (Oreta): Past tense of 折れる (oreru - to break, to snap, to bend). Specifically used for thin, long objects that snap or bend (e.g., branches, bones, pencils).
Example: 枝が折れた。 (Eda ga oreta.) The branch broke/snapped.
壊れた時計も一日二回は正しい = こわれたとけいもいちにちにかいはただしい = Kowareta tokei mo ichinichi nikai wa tadashii - This Japanese proverb expresses the same idea as its English counterpart: even something (or someone) that is usually wrong or unreliable can, by chance, be correct or useful occasionally. It implies that even in a state of malfunction or error, there are moments of accidental accuracy.- Breakdown: 壊れた (kowareta): broken (as explained previously) 時計 (tokei): clock, watch も (mo): also, even (particle, emphasizing "even a broken clock") 一日 (ichinichi): one day, a day 二回 (nikai): twice (two times) は (wa): topic particle (emphasizing "twice a day") 正しい (tadashii): correct, right, accurate (adjective) Literal Translation: "Even a broken clock is correct twice a day."
秘密兵器 = ひみつへいき = himitsu heiki = secret weapon - Himitsu Heiki is the direct and most common translation for "secret weapon" in Japanese. It refers to a weapon or piece of military technology whose existence or capabilities are kept confidential to gain a strategic advantage.
洗礼 = せんれい = senrei = baptism - Senrei is the standard and most common term for baptism in Japanese. It refers to the Christian rite of admission and adoption, typically involving the use of water as a symbol of purification or initiation. - Religious Context: Primarily used in a Christian context to refer to the sacrament or ceremony of baptism.
Example: キリスト教の洗礼を受ける。 (Kirisuto-kyō no senrei o ukeru.) To receive Christian baptism.
Example: 幼児洗礼 (yōji senrei) Infant baptism.
Example: 彼のデビュー戦はまさに洗礼だった。 (Kare no debyū-sen wa masa ni senrei datta.) His debut match was truly a baptism (of fire/initiation).
Example: 新人研修は厳しい洗礼だった。 (Shinjin kenshū wa kibishii senrei datta.) The rookie training was a tough baptism (a difficult initiation).
知識 = ちしき = chishiki = knowledge; information; learning
被害妄想 = ひがいもうそう = higai mousou = paranoia; delusion of persecution - This is the most precise medical or psychological term for paranoia, referring to the delusion that one is being persecuted or harmed.
疑心暗鬼になる = ぎしんあんきになる = gishin'anki ni naru = to become paranoid; to become suspicious and distrustful - literally: "to have doubts, and see shadows as demons") - This is a common idiomatic expression for becoming paranoid or excessively suspicious, where even harmless things seem threatening.
怪しい = あやしい = ayashii = suspicious; dubious; questionable; shady; unreliable - This is a very versatile and common word. It can describe a person, an object, a situation, or a smell that feels "suspicious" or "dubious." It often implies something is fishy, untrustworthy, or not quite right.
誕生 = たんじょう = tanjou = birth; creation; advent - This term is used for the act of being born, or the creation/establishment of something new (e.g., a new product, a new era, a new company).
むしろ = mushiro = rather; instead; better; preferably
克己 = こっき = kokki = self-denial; self-control; self-conquest - This term has a more philosophical or moral nuance, referring to overcoming one's own desires, weaknesses, or ego. It implies a strong form of self-mastery.
自制心 = じせいしん = jiseishin = self-control; self-restraint; self-discipline - This is the most direct and common translation for "self-control," referring to the ability to control one's impulses, emotions, or desires.
任務 = にんむ = ninmu = duty, task, assignment, mission - Ninmu refers to a duty, task, or assignment, which can also be translated as "mission." It emphasizes the specific, assigned responsibility or role that one has to perform. It's often used in military, public service, or professional contexts.
Example: 重大な任務 (jūdai na ninmu) = A grave/important duty/mission.
Example: 彼の任務は情報の収集だ。 = (Kare no ninmu wa jōhō no shūshū da.) = His mission/duty is to collect information.
使命 = しめい = shimei = mission, calling, destiny, task - Shimei is a common term for "mission" in Japanese, often carrying a strong nuance of a duty, calling, or destiny that one is compelled to fulfill. It implies a significant and often noble purpose.
Example: 彼の人生の使命は平和を実現することだ。 = (Kare no jinsei no shimei wa heiwa o jitsugen suru koto da.) = His life's mission is to achieve peace.
Example: それが我々の使命だ。= (Sore ga wareware no shimei da.) = That is our mission/duty.
Example: 会社の使命 (kaisha no shimei) = The company's mission.
Example: 重要な使命を果たす。 = (Jūyō na shimei o hatasu.) = To fulfill an important mission/task.
標的 (Hyōteki)
標的 = ひょうてき = hyōteki = target (for shooting, attack), objective, mark - Hyōteki is a common and versatile term for "target," especially in contexts related to shooting, aiming, or being the object of an attack or focus. It refers to something that is aimed at or made into an objective.
Example: 射撃の標的 (shageki no hyōteki) = A shooting target.
Example: 標的を狙う (hyōteki o nerau) = To aim at the target.
Example: テロの標的 (tero no hyōteki) = A target of terrorism.
Example: 批判の標的になる (hihan no hyōteki ni naru) = To become a target of criticism.
目標 = もくひょう = mokuhyō = goal, objective, aim, target - Mokuhyō refers to a goal, objective, or aim. While it can be translated as "target," it emphasizes the desired outcome or point of achievement rather than something physically aimed at or attacked.
Example: 人生における目標 (jinsei ni okeru mokuhyō) = Life goals/objectives.
Example: 目標を達成する (mokuhyō o tassei suru) = To achieve a goal/target.
Example: 目標地点 (mokuhyō chiten) = Target point / Destination. - Destination/Point to Aim For: Can refer to a specific point you are trying to reach (e.g., in navigation).
ごたごた = gota gota = (onomatopoeia/adverb) messy; disorderly; troublesome; complications; bickering - This is an onomatopoeic word (though not representing a sound directly, but a state or action) that conveys several related meanings depending on context:
敵 = てき = teki = enemy; foe; rival; opponent - This is the most common meaning, referring to an adversary in a conflict, competition, or general opposition.
 信仰 = しんこう = shinkou = (religious) faith; belief; creed - For religious faith, belief in a higher power, or a general spiritual conviction:
 信念 = しんねん = shinnen = belief; faith; conviction; creed - For a strong personal belief, conviction, or trust in an idea/principle (not necessarily religious):
信頼 = しんらい = shinrai = trust; reliance; faith; confidence
苦しみ = くるしみ = kurushimi = suffering, pain, distress, anguish - Kurushimi is the most direct and common term for suffering in Japanese. It encompasses various forms of pain, distress, anguish, both physical and mental. It comes from the verb 苦しむ (kurushimu - to suffer, to be distressed).
    * Example: 病気の苦しみ (byōki no kurushimi) The suffering of illness.
    * Example: 心の苦しみ (kokoro no kurushimi) Mental suffering/Anguish.
    * Example: 人生には多くの苦しみがある。 (Jinsei ni wa ōku no kurushimi ga aru.) There is much suffering in life.
慈悲 = じひ = jihi = mercy, compassion, benevolence (often religious context) - Jihi is the primary term for mercy in Japanese, especially with a strong connotation of compassion and benevolence. It often appears in religious contexts (particularly Buddhism, where it's a core concept) or when referring to a higher power or a person showing profound kindness and pity towards others.
    * Example: 神の慈悲 (kami no jihi) God's mercy.
    * Example: 慈悲深い仏様 (jihibukai Hotoke-sama) A merciful Buddha.
    * Example: 慈悲の心 (jihi no kokoro) A heart of mercy/compassion.
恵み = めぐみ = megumi = grace, blessing, favor, bounty - Megumi is the most common and versatile term for grace in Japanese, encompassing blessings, favors, or bounties bestowed by a higher power, nature, or even another person. It implies an undeserved gift or benefit.
    * Example: 神の恵み (kami no megumi) God's grace/blessing
    * Example: 大自然の恵み (daishizen no megumi) The bounty of great nature.
    * Example: あなたの恵みに感謝します。 (Anata no megumi ni kansha shimasu.) I am thankful for your favor/kindness.
恩寵 = おんちょう = onchō = grace, divine favor (more formal/solemn, often Christian) - Onchō also means grace and divine favor, but it is generally a more formal, solemn, and often specifically Christian term. It emphasizes the spiritual favor or blessing granted by God. - Christian Theology: Frequently used in discussions of Christian theology and liturgy.
    * Example: 神の恩寵によって (kami no onchō ni yotte) By God's grace.
優雅 = ゆうが = yūga = grace, elegance, refinement (describing movement/appearance) - Yūga refers to grace in the sense of elegance, refinement, or fluidity of movement or appearance. It describes aesthetic grace, not divine favor or mercy.
"Toriaezu" (とりあえず): =  meaning "for now," "first of all."
"Mamoru" (守る): = meaning "to protect," "to guard."
出て行ってください = でていってください = dete itte kudasai = Please get out / Please leave (a specific place) - Dete itte kudasai is a more direct and sometimes stronger way to ask someone to "please get out" or "please leave" a specific location (e.g., a room, a building). It can sound firm and, depending on tone, a bit abrupt or even angry.
責任を取る (Sekinin o Toru)
責任を取る = せきにんをとる = sekinin o toru = to take responsibility, to bear responsibility - Sekinin o Toru is the most common and direct way to express "to take responsibility" in Japanese. It means to accept the consequences of one's actions, decisions, or a situation, and to deal with them. This often implies making amends, apologizing, resigning, or facing accountability. - Accepting Consequences/Accountability: This is the primary meaning. It's used when someone acknowledges their role in an outcome (especially a negative one) and is prepared to address it.
Example: 失敗の責任を取る。 (Shippai no sekinin o toru.) = To take responsibility for a failure.
Example: 彼は今回の問題の責任を取って辞任した。= (Kare wa konkai no mondai no sekinin o totte jinin shita.) = He took responsibility for this problem and resigned.
命令 = めいれい = meirei = order, command, instruction, directive - Meirei refers to an "order" as a command or instruction given by someone in authority. This implies a directive that must be followed. It can be used as a noun or a verb (with する suru). - Commands (Military/Authority): Used in military, police, or other hierarchical settings where clear commands are given.
Example: 上官の命令に従う。(Jōkan no meirei ni shitagau.) = To obey a superior officer's order.
Example: 避難命令 (hinan meirei) = Evacuation order.
Example: 社長からの命令だ。(Shachō kara no meirei da.) = It's an order/directive from the president.
指示 = しじ = shiji = instruction, direction, order (less forceful than 命令 - Shiji refers to "instructions" or "directions," and while it can translate to "order," it's generally less forceful or absolute than meirei. It implies guidance or a specific way to do something.
Example: 上司からの指示 (jōshi kara no shiji) = Instructions/Directions from the boss.
Example: 彼の指示通りに作業を進める。(Kare no shiji-dōri ni sagyō o susumeru.) = To proceed with the work exactly according to his instructions.
運命 = うんめい = unmei = fate; destiny
煙 = けむり / けむ = kemuri / kemu = smoke, fumes, vapor - Kemuri (or Kemu, especially in compounds or as a more poetic form) is the most common and general term for smoke in Japanese. It refers to the visible gaseous products of burning materials.
教官 (Kyōkan)
教官 = きょうかん = kyōkan = instructor, coach, professor (in specific contexts) - Kyōkan is a very common term for an instructor, coach, or professor, particularly in contexts involving training, formal education (especially practical or vocational), or military settings. It refers to someone who teaches or guides others in a structured environment. 教 (kyō): teach, doctrine, religion - 官 (kan): government official, bureaucracy, office
Driving schools: 自動車学校の教官 (jidōsha gakkō no kyōkan) - Driving school instructor. - Formal Instruction/Training: Most frequently used for instructors in:
Military academies/training: 士官学校の教官 (shikan gakkō no kyōkan) - Military academy instructor. - Coach/Trainer: Can be used for a coach in certain sports or physical training, especially if it's structured or disciplinary.
Police academies: 警察学校の教官 (keisatsu gakkō no kyōkan) - Police academy instructor.
Vocational schools/Technical training: 専門学校の教官 (senmon gakkō no kyōkan) - Vocational school instructor. - University (less common than 教授): While it can sometimes be used for university professors, 教授 (kyōju) is far more common for academic professorships. Kyōkan might be used for practical training instructors at a university rather than research professors.
軍曹 = ぐんそう = gunsō = sergeant - Gunsō is the standard and direct translation for "sergeant" in the context of military ranks. It refers to a non-commissioned officer (NCO) rank found in armies, air forces, and sometimes police forces.
Example: 陸軍軍曹 (rikugun gunsō) = Army Sergeant. - Military Rank: Most commonly used to refer to the rank of sergeant in various armed forces.
Example: 軍曹に昇進する (gunsō ni shōshin suru) = To be promoted to sergeant.
巡査部長 = じゅんさぶちょう = junsa buchō = police sergeant (Japan) - Junsa Buchō is the specific rank for a police sergeant within the Japanese police force. This is an important distinction as the military "sergeant" (Gunsō) is not typically used for police in Japan.
Example: 巡査部長が現場に到着した。(Junsa Buchō ga genba ni tōchaku shita.) = A police sergeant arrived at the scene. - Japanese Police Rank: Exclusively used for a police sergeant in Japan.
特務曹長 (Tokumu Sōchō)
特務曹長 = とくむそうちょう = tokumu sōchō = Master Sergeant / Sergeant Major (historical/specific military) - Tokumu Sōchō translates to Master Sergeant or Sergeant Major in certain military contexts, especially in older Japanese military structures. While it contains "曹長" (Sōchō - a form of sergeant), "Tokumu" specifies a "special duty" or "senior" aspect.- Less common in modern everyday usage, more specific to military ranks, often senior NCO roles.
予想通り = よそうどおり = yosō dōri = as expected, as anticipated, just as one thought - Yosō Dōri is a very common Japanese phrase meaning "as expected," "as anticipated," or "just as one thought." It's used to express that an outcome or event aligns with one's predictions or expectations.
Example: 結果は予想通りだった。 = (Kekka wa yosō dōri datta.) = The result was as expected.
部隊 = ぶたい = butai = (military) unit, corps, force, detachment, squad - Butai is the primary and most common Japanese term for a (military) unit, corps, force, detachment, or squad. It refers to an organized group of military personnel or, by extension, any organized group designated for a specific task.- Military Context: Most frequently used to denote a military formation or group of soldiers. This is its core meaning. 部 (bu): section, department, part隊 (tai): group, company, party, corps
Example: 特殊部隊 (tokushu butai) = Special forces / Special unit.
Example: 敵部隊の動きを追う。(Teki butai no ugoki o ou.) = To track the movements of the enemy unit.
Example: 派遣部隊 (haken butai) = Dispatch unit / Task force.
Example: 救助部隊 (kyūjo butai) = Rescue team/unit. - General Organized Group (Figurative/Extended): Can sometimes be used metaphorically or in a slightly extended sense for any highly organized group working towards a common goal, like a professional team or a specific task force in a company, though this is less common than its military application.
情報収集 = じょうほうしゅうしゅう = jōhō shūshū = intelligence gathering, information collection - Jōhō Shūshū is the most common and direct term for "intelligence gathering" or "information collection" in Japanese. It refers to the systematic process of collecting data, facts, and intelligence from various sources.- 情報 (jōhō): information, intelligence - 収集 (shūshū): collection, gathering
Example: 市場の情報収集を行う。(Shijō no jōhō shūshū o okonau.) = To conduct market information gathering. - General Information Collection: Can be used broadly for collecting any kind of information, from market research to data for a report.
Example: 必要な情報収集を完了した。 (Hitsuyō na jōhō shūshū o kanryō shita.) = We completed the necessary information collection.
Example: 敵の情報収集活動 (teki no jōhō shūshū katsudō) = Enemy intelligence gathering activities. - Intelligence Gathering (Military/Security): While general, it is also the standard term used in military, security, and espionage contexts for intelligence operations.
Example: 情報収集部隊 (jōhō shūshū butai) = Intelligence gathering unit.
諜報活動 = ちょうほうかつどう = chōhō katsudō = espionage, intelligence activities - Chōhō Katsudō specifically refers to espionage or intelligence activities, often implying secret or clandestine operations to gather intelligence, especially from an adversary. It carries a stronger connotation of covert intelligence work.
Example: スパイは諜報活動に従事していた。(Supai wa chōhō katsudō ni jūji shite ita.) = The spy was engaged in espionage/intelligence activities. - More specific to spy activities and secret intelligence operations.
偵察 = ていさつ = teisatsu = reconnaissance, scouting, patrol - Focuses on observational intelligence. - Teisatsu specifically refers to reconnaissance or scouting, which is a type of intelligence gathering done by direct observation, usually in a military context to gather information about enemy positions, terrain, etc.
Example: 敵陣を偵察する。(Teijin o teisatsu suru.) = To conduct reconnaissance on enemy positions.
Example: 偵察部隊 (teisatsu butai) = Reconnaissance unit.
情報分析 = じょうほうぶんせき = jōhō bunseki = intelligence analysis, information analysis - While not "gathering," Jōhō Bunseki is the crucial next step after jōhō shūshū, referring to the analysis of collected information/intelligence.
Example: 収集した情報を分析する。(Shūshū shita jōhō o bunseki suru.) = To analyze the collected information.
強襲部隊 = きょうしゅうぶたい = kyōshū butai = strike team, assault force, raiding party - Kyōshū Butai is the most direct and common translation for "strike team" in Japanese, especially in military or tactical contexts. It refers to a highly specialized and often small unit designed for rapid, decisive, and aggressive action, often involving an assault or raid. - Military/Tactical: Primarily used for military, special forces, police SWAT teams, or other combat/intervention units.
Example: テロリスト制圧のために強襲部隊が投入された。 = (Terorisuto seiatsu no tame ni kyōshū butai ga tōnyū sareta.) = A strike team was deployed to neutralize the terrorists.
Example: 敵の拠点に強襲部隊が突入した。 = (Teki no kyoten ni kyōshū butai ga totsunyū shita.) = A strike team stormed the enemy stronghold.
類似点 (Ruijiten)
類似点 = るいじてん = ruijiten = similarities, points of resemblance - Ruijiten is the most common and direct term for "similarities" in Japanese. It refers to the points or aspects in which two or more things resemble each other or are alike. It's often used in formal or analytical contexts when comparing items, concepts, or situations. - 類似 (rui-ji): resemblance, similarity, analogous - 点 (ten): point, aspect- 
Comparison/Analysis: Frequently used when discussing shared characteristics or resemblances.
Example: 二つの文化の類似点を比較する。= (Futatsu no bunka no ruijiten o hikaku suru.) = To compare the similarities of the two cultures.
Example: 彼の研究には多くの類似点がある。 = (Kare no kenkyū ni wa ōku no ruijiten ga aru.) = There are many similarities in his research. - Formal/Academic: Tends to be used in more structured discussions, presentations, or writing.
共通点 = きょうつうてん = kyōtsūten = common points, commonalities, shared characteristics - Kyōtsūten refers to "common points," "commonalities," or "shared characteristics." While very close to ruijiten, kyōtsūten specifically emphasizes aspects that are shared or held in common by multiple things, rather than just resembling each other.
Example: 私たちには多くの共通点がある。 = (Watashitachi ni wa ōku no kyōtsūten ga aru.) = We have many commonalities/shared characteristics. - Shared Traits: Often used when identifying things that are present in all or most items being compared.
Example: 両者の間に共通点は見当たらない。 = (Ryōsha no aida ni kyōtsūten wa miataranai.) = No common points can be found between the two. - Can be slightly more conversational than ruijiten in some contexts.
同様性 = どうようせい = dōyōsei = similarity, likeness, sameness - Dōyōsei is a more abstract or technical term for "similarity," "likeness," or "sameness." It emphasizes the state or degree of being similar.
偶然の = ぐうぜんの = gūzen no = coincidental, by chance, accidental, fortuitous - Gūzen no is the most common and direct way to express "coincidental" in Japanese. It means something happening by chance, accidentally, or fortuitously, without intentional planning or a clear cause-and-effect relationship. It functions as an adjective (when modifying a noun directly, using 「の - no」). - By Chance/Accidental: The core meaning is about something occurring unexpectedly or without human intent.
Example: それは全くの偶然の出来事だった。= (Sore wa mattaku no gūzen no dekigoto datta.) = That was a completely coincidental event.
Example: 偶然の出会い (gūzen no deai) = A coincidental meeting / A chance encounter. - Fortuitous: Can imply a positive or lucky coincidence. - Often used with the adverbial form 偶然に (gūzen ni):
Example: 彼は偶然に私の隣に座った。(Kare wa gūzen ni watashi no tonari ni suwatta.) = He coincidentally sat next to me.
たまたま = たまたま = tamatama = by chance, accidentally, fortuitously (adverb) - Tamatama is an adverb meaning "by chance," "accidentally," or "fortuitously." It's a more informal and colloquial way to express coincidence than gūzen ni.
Example: 昨日、たまたま彼に会った。 = (Kinō, tamatama kare ni atta.) = Yesterday, I happened to meet him / I met him by chance. - Emphasis on Happenstance: Places emphasis on the unexpected and unplanned nature of an event.
奇遇な = きぐうな = kigū na = strange coincidence, remarkable coincidence, serendipitous = Kigū na refers to a strange, remarkable, or serendipitous coincidence. It's used when a coincidence is particularly striking, unusual, or even a bit uncanny. It carries a sense of surprise or pleasant unexpectedness.
Example: 「こんな所で会うなんて、奇遇ですね！」= ("Konna tokoro de au nante, kigū desu ne!") = "To meet you in a place like this, what a strange coincidence!" -Often used as an exclamation of surprise.
確かに = たしかに = tashika ni = indeed, certainly, surely, undoubtedly, true, that's right - Tashika ni is a very common and versatile Japanese adverb used to express agreement, confirmation, or affirmation. It indicates that something is true, certain, or that the speaker acknowledges or agrees with what has been said.  "Indeed" / "Certainly" / "Undoubtedly" (Strong Affirmation): - Used to strongly confirm the truth or accuracy of something.
Example: 確かに彼は優秀だ。= (Tashika ni kare wa yūshū da.) = He is certainly excellent.
Example: その話は確かに本当だ。 = (Sono hanashi wa tashika ni hontō da.) = That story is indeed true. - 
Example: A: 「この問題は難しいですね。」 (Kono mondai wa muzukashii desu ne.) - "This problem is difficult, isn't it?" - B: 「ええ、確かに。」 (Ee, tashika ni.) - "Yes, indeed." / "That's right."  - "That's right" / "True" / "You have a point" (Agreement/Acknowledgement): - Used in conversation to acknowledge or agree with what someone else has said, often when you realize the truth of their statement.
Example: 言われてみれば、確かにそうですね。= (Iwarete mireba, tashika ni sō desu ne.) = Now that you mention it, that's certainly true. / "You have a point."
Example: 確かにそう聞いたはずだ。= (Tashika ni sō kiita hazu da.) = I certainly heard it that way. / I'm pretty sure I heard it that way. - "If I'm not mistaken" / "For sure" (When confirming one's own memory, less common but exists): Sometimes implies a degree of certainty about one's own memory or understanding.
選択 = せんたく = sentaku = choice, selection, option - Sentaku is the most common and direct term for "choice," "selection," or "option" in Japanese. It refers to the act of choosing from alternatives or the actual item/course of action that is chosen. It can be used as a noun or a verb (when combined with する suru).選 (sen): choose, select, elect 択 (taku): choose, select, opt
Example: どちらか選択してください。 = (Dochira ka sentaku shite kudasai.) = Please make a choice between the two.
Example: 人生における選択 (jinsei ni okeru sentaku) = Choices in life.
Example: メニューから好きなものを選択する。= (Menyū kara suki na mono o sentaku suru.) = To select what you like from the menu.
Example: 複数の選択肢 (fukusū no sentakushi) = Multiple options/choices.
欲望 = よくぼう = yokubō = desire, lust, craving, avarice = Yokubō is the most direct and general term for "desire" in Japanese. It refers to a strong craving or longing for something, often implying a fundamental human want, including physical, material, or emotional desires. It can sometimes carry a connotation of strong, even base or unchecked, desires (like lust or greed), but it is also used in a neutral sense.
Example: 彼の欲望は尽きることがない。(Kare no yokubō wa tsukiru koto ga nai.) = His desires are endless.
Example: 食欲の欲望 (shokuyoku no yokubō) = The desire for food / Appetite. - Stronger/Base Desires: Can be used for lust, greed, avarice, or selfish desires.
Example: 人間の三大欲望 (ningen no sandai yokubō) = The three great human desires (often referring to hunger, sleep, and sexual desire).
願望 = がんぼう = ganbō = desire, wish, aspiration, hope - Ganbō is also a strong term for "desire," but it carries a nuance of a wish, aspiration, or hope that one strongly holds. It's often related to something ideal, a future state, or a personal ambition. It tends to be more positive or neutral than yokubō, which can sometimes imply a more base craving.
Example: 長年の願望が叶った。(Naganen no ganbō ga kanatta.) = My long-cherished desire/wish came true.
Example: 平和への願望 (heiwa e no ganbō) = A desire for peace.
欲求 = よっきゅう = yokkyū = desire, want, need, urge, demand - Yokkyū refers to a desire, want, or need, often emphasizing a fundamental urge or psychological need (e.g., in psychology, like Maslow's hierarchy of needs). It's more about an innate drive or a basic requirement.
Example: 自己実現欲求 (jiko jitsugen yokkyū) = Self-actualization needs/desires.
Example: 生存欲求 (seizon yokkyū) = Survival instinct/desire.
希望 = きぼう = kibō = hope, wish, desire, aspiration - Kibō primarily means "hope," but it can also be used for "desire" or "wish" when that desire is linked to optimism about the future or a positive outcome. It's generally a more positive and gentle term than the others.
Example: 将来への希望 (shōrai e no kibō) = Hope for the future.
Example: 合格を希望する。(Gōkaku o kibō suru.) = To desire/hope to pass (an exam).
ぼうっとする = ぼうっとする = bōtto suru = to be spaced out, to be dazed, to be absent-minded, to gaze vacantly - Bōtto suru is the most common and natural way to express "to be spaced out," "to be dazed," or "to be absent-minded." It describes a state where one's mind is not focused, they might be staring blankly, or they are just not fully present mentally. - Lack of Focus/Awareness: Implies a temporary mental disconnect from the surroundings.
Example: 彼は授業中いつもぼうっとしている。= (Kare wa jugyōchū itsumo bōtto shite iru.) = He is always spaced out during class.
Example: 何をそんなにぼうっとしているの？= (Nani o sonna ni bōtto shite iru no?) = Why are you so spaced out?
Example: 窓の外をぼうっと眺めていた。= (Mado no soto o bōtto nagamete ita.) = I was gazing vacantly out the window. - Daydreaming/Vacant Stare: Can also describe a state of daydreaming or just looking blankly.
脅威 = きょうい = kyōi = menace, threat, danger, peril - Kyōi is the most direct and common translation for "menace" in Japanese. It refers to something that poses a threat, danger, or peril, whether it's a person, an organization, a natural phenomenon, or an abstract concept.
Example: 地球温暖化は人類にとっての脅威だ。(Chikyū on-danka wa jinrui ni totte no kyōi da.) = Global warming is a menace/threat to humanity. - General Threat/Danger: Used broadly to describe anything that is a source of apprehension or harm.
Example: 敵の脅威に備える。(Teki no kyōi ni sonaeru.) = To prepare for the enemy's menace/threat.
Example: 彼はチームにとって常に脅威だった。(Kare wa chīmu ni totte tsune ni kyōi datta.) = He was always a menace/threat to the team. - Something Intimidating: Can also refer to something that is imposing or intimidating due to its power or potential for harm.
脅かし = おどかし = odoshi = threat, intimidation, menace (often an act of threatening) - Odoshi refers to a threat or act of intimidation. While kyōi is the source of the menace, odoshi often describes the act of making a threat or the intimidation itself. It comes from the verb 脅す (odosu - to threaten, to intimidate).
Example: 彼の言葉は脅かしだった。(Kare no kotoba wa odoshi datta.) = His words were a threat/menace (an act of threatening).
Example: 単なる脅かしではない。(Tannaru odoshi de wa nai.) = It's not just an empty threat.
自由意志 = じゆういし = jiyū ishi = free will - Jiyū Ishi is the direct and standard translation for "free will" in Japanese. This term is used in philosophical, psychological, and everyday contexts to discuss the concept of individuals having the ability to make choices and decisions independently, rather than being determined by external forces or fate. 自由 (jiyū): freedom, liberty, unrestraint 意志 (ishi): will, volition, intention
Example: 人間に自由意志はあるのかという議論。(Ningen ni jiyū ishi wa aru no ka to iu giron.) = The debate over whether humans have free will. - Philosophical/Abstract Concept: Most commonly used when discussing the philosophical concept of free will, its existence, and its implications.
Example: 彼の行動は自由意志によるものだ。(Kare no kōdō wa jiyū ishi ni yoru mono da.) = His actions are based on his free will. - Contrasted with Determinism/Fate: Often used in contrast to ideas of destiny (運命 - unmei) or predetermination. - Individual Autonomy: Refers to the power of self-determination or the ability to act on one's own volition.
自分の意志 = じぶんのいし = jibun no ishi = one's own will, one's own intention, one's own volition - Jibun no Ishi is a very common Japanese phrase that directly translates to "one's own will," "one's own intention," or "one's own volition." It emphasizes that a decision, action, or desire originates from the individual themselves, rather than being influenced or forced by others.
Example: これは私の自分の意志です。= (Kore wa watashi no jibun no ishi desu.) = This is my own will/decision. - Personal Will/Decision: This is the core meaning. It highlights personal agency and self-determination.
Example: 彼は自分の意志でその道を選んだ。= (Kare wa jibun no ishi de sono michi o eranda.) = He chose that path by his own will/volition.
Example: 誰にも強制されず、自分の意志でやった。= (Dare ni mo kyōsei sarezu, jibun no ishi de yatta.) = I did it by my own will, without being forced by anyone.  - Without External Influence: Often used to contrast with actions done under pressure, coercion, or someone else's command.
集団的無意識 (Shūdanteki Muishiki)
集団的無意識 = しゅうだんてきむいしき = shūdanteki muishiki = collective unconscious - Shūdanteki Muishiki is the direct and standard Japanese translation for "collective unconscious." This term originates from Carl Jung's analytical psychology and refers to a part of the unconscious mind, shared by all of humanity, that contains archetypes and instincts inherited from our ancestors. - 集団 (shūdan): group, collective 的 (teki): (suffix indicating 'pertaining to' or 'of') 無意識 (muishiki): unconscious, unawareness 無 (mu): nothing, not, non- 意識 (ishiki): consciousness, awareness - Jungian Psychology: This is its primary context. When discussing Jungian theories, this term is used to describe the universal, inherited psychological structures common to all humans.
Example: ユングの提唱した集団的無意識の概念。 = (Yungu no teishō shita shūdanteki muishiki no gainen.) = Jung's proposed concept of the collective unconscious.
Example: 神話には集団的無意識の象徴が表れている。= (Shinwa ni wa shūdanteki muishiki no shōchō ga arawarete iru.) = Myths reveal symbols of the collective unconscious. - Universal Archetypes/Symbols: It often implies the shared patterns of thought and imagery that appear in myths, religions, and dreams across cultures.
無意識 = むいしき = muishiki = unconscious (mind), unawareness, reflex - Muishiki refers to the "unconscious" or "unawareness" in a more general sense. While shūdanteki muishiki is a specific type of unconscious, muishiki can refer to any part of the mind that operates without conscious awareness, including the personal unconscious.
Example: 無意識のうちにそうしてしまった。= (Muishiki no uchi ni sō shite shimatta.) = I did it unconsciously/without realizing it.
Example: 無意識の行動 (muishiki no kōdō) = Unconscious action / Reflexive action.
生きる意志 = いきるいし = ikiru ishi = will to live - Ikiru Ishi is the most direct and common translation for "will to live" in Japanese. It refers to the innate drive, desire, or determination to continue living, especially in challenging or adverse circumstances. - Determination to Survive: Most frequently used to describe a strong resolve to overcome difficulties and continue one's life, even when facing illness, danger, or despair. 生きる (ikiru): verb meaning "to live," "to exist." - 意志 (ishi): will, volition, intention (as seen in jiyū ishi for "free will" and jibun no ishi for "one's own will").
Example: 彼は病気と闘う生きる意志が強かった。 = (Kare wa byōki to tatakau ikiru ishi ga tsuyokatta.) = He had a strong will to live in his fight against the illness.
Example: 絶望的な状況でも生きる意志を失わなかった。 = (Zetsubōteki na jōkyō demo ikiru ishi o ushinawanakatta.) = Even in a desperate situation, he did not lose his will to live.
もう一つの世界 (Mō Hitotsu no Sekai)
もう一つの世界 = もうひとつのせかい = mō hitotsu no sekai = another world, the other world, an alternate world - Mō Hitotsu no Sekai is a common Japanese phrase that directly translates to "another world" or "the other world." In contexts like Persona 5, it serves as a descriptive term for a separate, often hidden or alternate, reality that exists alongside the real one. - もう (mō): another, one more 一つ (hitotsu): one (counter for general items) の (no): possessive particle 世界 (sekai): world - Alternate Reality/Dimension: Used to refer to a world that is distinct from the current or common reality.
Example: 夢の中はもう一つの世界のようだ。 = (Yume no naka wa mō hitotsu no sekai no yō da.) = Inside dreams is like another world. - 
認知の世界 = にんちのせかい = ninchi no sekai = cognitive world, world of cognition - Ninchi no Sekai directly translates to "cognitive world" or "world of cognition." This phrase emphasizes that the world is a product or reflection of human thought, perception, and understanding. In Persona 5, it specifically highlights that the Palaces and Mementos are manifested from the characters' or collective's distorted cognitions. - 認知 (ninchi): cognition, recognition, awareness, perception の (no): possessive particle 世界 (sekai): world
Example: ペルソナは、人の認知の世界から生まれる。= (Perusona wa, hito no ninchi no sekai kara umareru.) = Personas are born from people's cognitive worlds. - World of Perception/Thought: Describes a reality shaped by mental processes.
異世界 = いせかい = isekai = otherworld, different world, alternate world - Isekai is a widely recognized and popular term that translates to "otherworld," "different world," or "alternate world." It's predominantly used in Japanese fiction, particularly in light novels, manga, and anime, to describe a genre where a protagonist is transported from their ordinary world (usually Earth) to another, often fantasy, world. 異 (i): different, unusual, strange 世界 (sekai): world
急ぐがいい = いそぐがいい = isogu ga ii = You'd better hurry, You should hurry, It's best to hurry = Isogu ga Ii is a Japanese phrase that means "You'd better hurry," "You should hurry," or "It's best to hurry." It's a relatively direct but not overly harsh suggestion or advice to someone to speed up or act quickly. - Advice/Suggestion: It's often used as advice given by one person to another, indicating that hurrying is the better course of action.
Example: 電車に間に合うように急ぐがいい。 = (Densha ni間に合うように isogu ga ii.) = You'd better hurry to make it on time for the train.
形見 = かたみ = katami = memento; keepsake; souvenir - This is a very common and direct translation, especially used for items left by a deceased person or things that evoke strong memories of someone or something precious.
思い出の品 = おもいでのしな = omoide no shina = memento; keepsake; souvenir (literally "item of memories") - This is a more descriptive phrase meaning "an item of memories," which directly conveys the idea of a memento.
恥ずかしい (Hazukashii)
恥ずかしい = はずかしい = hazukashii = embarrassing, shy, ashamed - Hazukashii is the most common and versatile Japanese adjective for "embarrassing," "shy," or "ashamed." It describes a feeling of discomfort, awkwardness, or humiliation due to one's own actions, words, or circumstances, or a general feeling of bashfulness. 恥 (haji): shame, disgrace, embarrassment (root) ずかしい (zukashii): common adjective ending for feelings.
Example: 恥ずかしい間違いをした。 (Hazukashii machigai o shita.) = I made an embarrassing mistake.
Example: それはとても恥ずかしい話だ。 (Sore wa totemo hazukashii hanashi da.) = That's a very embarrassing story.
Example: 彼は人前ではとても恥ずかしいがり屋だ。 (Kare wa hitomae dewa totemo hazukashii-gariya da.) = He is very shy in front of people. - Shy/Bashful (feeling): It also directly expresses the feeling of shyness or bashfulness.
Example: 自分の行動が恥ずかしい。 (Jibun no kōdō ga hazukashii.) = I am ashamed of my own actions. - Ashamed (feeling): Can convey a sense of shame or disgrace.
飛沫 = しぶき = shibuki = spray, splash, foam
お疲れ様です = おつかれさまです = Otsukaresama desu = You must be tired / Good work / Thank you for your hard work / (Greeting for someone who has completed a task)
何してる？ = なにしてる？ = nani shiteru? = What are you doing? / What are you up to?
城 = しろ = shiro = castle - Shiro is the most common and direct Japanese term for "castle." It refers to a fortified building or complex, typically historical, designed for defense and often serving as a residence for a lord or a strategic military outpost.
くれ = くれ = kure = Informal & Direct: Used among very close friends, family, or towards subordinates. It can sound demanding, rough, or even rude if used with someone you are not close with or in a formal setting. - Masculine/Rough Tone: It often carries a masculine or rough tone, though women might use it in very informal or exasperated situations.
くれる = (kureru)  = means "to give (to me or my in-group)."
「くれ = (kure)」= as an Imperative Verb Form  - When used as a verb form, 「くれ (kure)」 is a direct, informal, and somewhat blunt command asking someone to do something for you (or for your in-group). - Requesting a Favor/Action (from the speaker's perspective):
Example: それをくれ！ (Sore o kure!) - Give me that!
Example: 早く来いよ、手伝ってくれ！ (Hayaku koi yo, tetsudatte kure!) - Hurry up and come, help me!
Example: 教えてくれ。 (Oshiete kure.) - Tell me. (Teach me.) - It attaches to the te-form of a verb (e.g., 教える (oshieru) -> 教えて (oshiete) + くれ = 教えてくれ (oshietekure)). - When used for "to give," it's just 「くれ」.
Informal & Direct: Used among very close friends, family, or towards subordinates. It can sound demanding, rough, or even rude if used with someone you are not close with or in a formal setting. - Masculine/Rough Tone: It often carries a masculine or rough tone, though women might use it in very informal or exasperated situations.
Compare: ちょっと手伝って。(Chotto tetsudatte.) - "Help me a bit." (softer request)
手伝ってくれ！ (Tetsudatte kure!) - "Help me!" (direct command)
犯罪者 = はんざいしゃ = hanzaisha = criminal, offender, culprit - Hanzaisha is the most general and widely understood term for a "criminal" or "offender." It refers to someone who has committed a crime, especially a serious one. This is often the most direct translation in legal or journalistic contexts. 犯 (han): crime, offense 罪 (zai): sin, crime, guilt 者 (sha): person
Example: 彼は指名手配されている犯罪者だ。= (Kare wa shimeitehai sarete iru hanzaisha da.) = He is a wanted criminal/offender.
犯人 = はんにん = hannin = culprit, perpetrator, criminal, offender (often the specific one responsible) - Hannin is very similar to hanzaisha but often carries the nuance of the "culprit" or "perpetrator" – the specific person who committed a particular crime or act. It's frequently used in crime reporting, investigations, or when the focus is on identifying the individual responsible. 犯 (han): crime, offense 人 (nin): person
Example: 事件の犯人が捕まった。 = (Jiken no hannin ga tsukamatta.) = The culprit/offender of the incident was caught. - Less formal than Hanzaisha: Can be used in slightly less formal contexts than hanzaisha while still being appropriate for criminal acts.
違反者 = いはんしゃ = ihansha = violator, offender (of rules, laws, regulations) - Ihōsha specifically refers to a "violator" or "offender" of rules, laws, regulations, or agreements. This term is broader than hanzaisha as it doesn't always imply a serious crime, but rather a transgression against established norms or rules. - Rule/Law Violator: Used for breaking any kind of rule, from minor traffic violations to more significant breaches that may or may not be criminal. 違 (i): differ, violate, disobey 反 (han): oppose, revert, anti- 者 (sha): person
Example: スピード違反者には罰金が科せられる。 = (Supīdo ihansha ni wa bakkin ga kase rareru.) = A fine will be imposed on speed offenders/violators.
Example: 駐車違反者。 = (Chūsha ihansha.) = Parking offender/violator. - Legal or Administrative Context: Common in official warnings, regulations, or discussions about non-compliance.
罪人 = ざいにん = zainin = sinner, criminal, guilty person (often with a moral or historical nuance) - Zainin means "sinner" or "criminal." While it can mean a criminal, it often carries a more historical, moral, or even religious connotation of someone who has committed a "sin" or "wrongdoing" rather than just a legal offense. It can sound more dramatic or old-fashioned when referring to modern-day criminals. 罪 (zai): sin, crime, guilt 人 (nin): person
Example: 彼は自分の罪人であることを認めた。= (Kare wa jibun no zainin de aru koto o mitometa.) = He admitted that he was a sinner/guilty person. - Historical/Literary: More common in historical dramas, literature, or when discussing moral transgressions.
破滅 = はめつ = hametsu = ruin, destruction, downfall, fall, disaster (often personal/fatal) - Hametsu is a powerful Japanese noun that signifies "ruin," "destruction," "downfall," or "disaster." It strongly implies a complete and often irreparable, tragic, or fatal end, particularly for a person, family, plan, or even a nation or ideology. It carries a sense of ultimate failure or irreparable loss. - 破 (ha): to tear, to break, to destroy, to defeat 滅 (metsu): to destroy, to ruin, to perish, to extinguish
Example: 彼のギャンブルが破滅を招いた。= (Kare no gyanburu ga hametsu o manaita.) = His gambling invited his ruin/downfall. - Personal Downfall/Tragedy: Most commonly used to describe the utter collapse or tragic end of an individual's life, career, or moral standing.
Example: そのスキャンダルは彼のキャリアの破滅だった。 = (Sono sukandaru wa kare no kyaria no hametsu datta.) = That scandal was the ruin of his career. 
Example: 戦争は国を破滅させた。= (Sensō wa kuni o hametsu saseta.) = The war brought the country to ruin/destruction. - Societal/Systemic Destruction: Can also be used for the collapse or ultimate destruction of larger entities like countries, organizations, or even abstract concepts like hope or freedom (as seen in Persona 5).
Example: 人類の自由の破滅。 = (Jinrui no jiyū no hametsu.) = The ruin of humanity's freedom. - Fatalistic/Inevitable End: Often implies a definitive and unfortunate end from which recovery is impossible or extremely difficult.
Noun: 破滅 (hametsu) = ruin, destruction
Verb: 破滅する (hametsu suru) = to be ruined, to be destroyed, to fall apart, to meet one's downfall.
Example: 彼は破滅した。 (Kare wa hametsu shita.) = He was ruined/met his downfall.
なら = A なら B = nara = if (A, then B; in the case of A, then B); as for (A, then B)
Example: 東京に行くなら、お土産買ってきてね。= (Tōkyō ni iku nara, omiyage katte kite ne.) = If you're going to Tokyo, buy me a souvenir, okay? (Speaker assumes the listener is going to Tokyo) - Conditional (often based on speaker's knowledge/assumption): It introduces a condition, and the following clause is a consequence or action based on that condition. It implies the speaker has heard or assumes something.
Example: これが本当なら、大変だ。 = (Kore ga hontō nara, taihen da.) = If this is true, it's serious.
Example: 日本語なら、少し話せます。= (Nihongo nara, sukoshi hanasemasu.) = As for Japanese, I can speak a little. - "As for X..." / "In the case of X...": It can also be used to single out a topic and then comment on it.
Example: 私なら、大丈夫です。= (Watashi nara, daijōbu desu.) = As for me, I'm fine.
野郎 ふざけ上げて = やろう ふざけあげて = yarō fuzakeagete = Bastard, stop messing around! / You jerk, cut it out! / You moron, screw around some more! (very informal, rude)-Nuance: This is a highly derogatory and insulting term for a man (though sometimes used generally for a person in anger). It's very rude and indicates contempt or extreme anger. It's like calling someone a "bastard" or "jerk" in English. 野郎 (Yarō): Meaning: Bastard, jerk, ass, scoundrel, damn guy. ふざけ上げて (Fuzakeagete) This is the -te form of the verb ふざけ上げる (fuzakeageru). 
ふざけ上がる (fuzakeageru): To mess around too much, to get carried away with foolishness, to screw around to a high degree. It implies that someone is taking their foolishness, joking, or unserious behavior to an extreme or annoying level.
ふざける (fuzakeru): The root verb meaning "to fool around," "to joke," "to mess around," "to play the fool." - The ～上げる (ageru) suffix, when attached to the -masu stem of a verb (like ふざける -> ふざけます -> ふざけ上げます), often indicates that the action is done to a great extent, completely, or excessively. So, "fuzakeageru" means "to mess around excessively." - The -te form here can be used as a command or to express strong exasperation, often implying "keep doing it, see what happens" or "stop doing it already!" in an angry tone.
舌 = した = shita = tongue
Example: 舌を出す。 (Shita o dasu.) = To stick out one's tongue.
Example: 舌を噛む。 (Shita o kamu.) = To bite one's tongue. - Figurative Use: Can be used in some idiomatic expressions, similar to English.
舌を出す = したをだす = shita o dasu = to stick out one's tongue - This common phrase describes the action of sticking out one's tongue. It can be done for various reasons, from a childish gesture to showing defiance or an expression of tiredness/exasperation.
舌が肥える = したをこえる = shita ga koeru = to develop a refined palate / to become a gourmet - Literally meaning "one's tongue grows fat," this idiom refers to developing a discerning taste for food and drink, becoming a gourmet.
舌足らず = したたらず = shitatarazu = lisp, imperfect articulation, baby talk - This term describes someone who has a lisp or speaks imperfectly, often like a child. It literally means "short tongue."
舌鼓を打つ = したづつみをうつ = shitazutsumi o utsu = to smack one's lips (in satisfaction/relish) - This idiom describes the act of smacking one's lips, typically done when eating something delicious or anticipating a tasty meal, showing enjoyment or relish.
正勝吾勝 = まさかつ あがつ = masakatsu agatsu = True victory is victory over oneself. - Masakatsu Agatsu is a profound and philosophical Japanese phrase that encapsulates a core concept found in various martial arts, spiritual disciplines, and personal development philosophies. It directly translates to: 正勝 (Masakatsu): True victory, genuine victory, righteous victory. - 正 (masa): Correct, righteous, true, genuine. 勝 (katsu): Victory, win. 吾勝 (Agatsu): Victory over oneself. 吾 (a): My, I (an older, more emphatic form of "ware" or "waga"). 勝 (gatsu): Victory, win (changes pronunciation due to compound word rules).
たまらなく = たまらなく = tamaranaku = unbearably, irresistibly, extremely - Tamaranaku is an adverb derived from the verb 堪らない (tamaranai), which means "cannot bear," "cannot stand," or "irresistible."
英語で言ってください = Eigo de ite kudasai = translates to "Please say it in English." It's a polite way to ask someone to speak in English
すごい = Sugoku = in Japanese means "very," "awfully," or "immensely,"
大したことのない = たいしたことのない = taishita koto no nai = insignificant; trivial; not a big deal.
大したことのない量 = taishita koto no nai ryou = an insignificant amount/quantity
搭乗券 = とうじょうけん = tōjōken = - **搭乗 (tōjō)**: boarding (as in boarding a plane or ship) **券 (ken)**: ticket, coupon, pass - So, **搭乗券 (tōjōken)** literally means "boarding ticket/pass."
到着 = tōchaku = is a Japanese word that means **"arrival"** or **"to arrive."**
くしゃみをする (kushami o suru) = to sneeze
普段の = Fudan no is a Japanese phrase that means **"usual," "ordinary," "everyday,"** or **"normal."**
普段の生活 (fudan no seikatsu) =  everyday life
普段の会話 = fudan no kaiwa = ** directly translates to **"everyday conversation"** or **"normal conversation."**
教育 = kyōiku = is a Japanese term that translates directly to **"education."**
部門 = bumon =  This kanji means "department," "division," or "section."
会計士 = かいけいし = kaikeishi = accountant
弁護士 = べんごし = bengoshi =  lawyer
賃金 = ちんぎん  = sangin = wages
疲労 = ひろう = hirou = fatigue
痒み = かゆみ = kayumi = itch/itchiness
卒業  = そつぎょう = sotsogyou = graduation
仕事に就く = しごとにつく = shigoto ni tsuku =  to get a job
くらせていけるだけの賃金  =くらせていけるだけのちんぎん = Kurasete ikeru dake no chingin = livable wage
トウモロコシ = とうもろこし = tōmorokoshi = corn, maize
島 = しま = shima = island - Shima is the most common and direct Japanese word for "island." It refers to a piece of land completely surrounded by water.
Example: 日本は多くの島からなる国です。= (Nihon wa ōku no shima kara naru kuni desu.) = Japan is a country made up of many islands.
Example: 無人島 (mujintō) = uninhabited island. (Note the pronunciation change from shima to tō in compounds).
じま = jima = island (used as a suffix in compound words and proper nouns) - Jima is a common pronunciation of the kanji 島 (shima) when it acts as a suffix in compound words or proper nouns, particularly in place names. While shima is the standalone word for "island," jima is how it often sounds when combined with other elements.
火山 = かざん = kazan = volcano - Kazan is the most common and direct Japanese word for "volcano." It refers to a mountain or hill, typically conical, having a crater or vent through which lava, rock fragments, hot vapor, and gas are or have been erupted from the earth's crust. Japan is a volcanically active country.
Example: 富士山は美しい火山です。 = (Fujisan wa utsukushii kazan desu.) = Mount Fuji is a beautiful volcano.
Example: 活火山 (katsukazan) = active volcano
Example: 休火山 (kyūkazan) = dormant volcano
噴火 = ふんか = funka = volcanic eruption - Funka refers to a volcanic eruption. It describes the event where a volcano expels lava, ash, gases, and rocks.
Example: 山が噴火した。 = (Yama ga funka shita.) = The mountain erupted (literally: the mountain had a volcanic eruption).
Example: 大規模な噴火。= (Daikibo na funka.) = A large-scale eruption.
溶岩 = ようがん = yōgan = lava - Yōgan is the Japanese word for "lava," the molten rock that flows from a volcano during an eruption.
Example: 溶岩流が村に迫っている。= (Yōganryū ga mura ni sematte iru.) = The lava flow is approaching the village.
火山灰 = かざんばい = kazambai = volcanic ash - Kazambai refers to volcanic ash, the pulverized rock, mineral, and glass fragments ejected from a volcano during an eruption.
Example: 火山灰が街に降り積もった。 = (Kazambai ga machi ni furitsumotta.) = Volcanic ash accumulated in the town.
噴煙 = ふんえん = fun'en = volcanic smoke, eruption plume - Fun'en refers to the volcanic smoke or eruption plume that rises from a volcano, typically consisting of ash and gases.
Example: 火山から黒い噴煙が上がっている。 = (Kazan kara kuroi fun'en ga agatte iru.) = Black volcanic smoke is rising from the volcano.
地震 = じしん = jishin = earthquake - Jishin is the most common and direct Japanese word for "earthquake." It refers to a sudden and violent shaking of the ground, sometimes causing great destruction, as a result of movements within the earth's crust or volcanic action. Japan experiences frequent earthquakes.
Example: 大きな地震があった。 = (Ōkina jishin ga atta.) = There was a big earthquake.
Example: 地震速報 (jishin sokuhō) = Earthquake early warning.
Example: マグニチュード7の地震。= (Magunichūdo nana no jishin.) = A magnitude 7 earthquake.
震度 = しんど = shindo = seismic intensity (Japanese scale) - Shindo refers to seismic intensity, specifically on the Japan Meteorological Agency (JMA) seismic intensity scale. This scale measures the degree of shaking at a specific location, rather than the total energy released (magnitude). It ranges from 0 to 7, with 7 being the strongest.
Example: この地域では震度5弱を観測しました。 = (Kono chiiki de wa shindo go-jaku o kansoku shimashita.) = Seismic intensity of 5-minus was observed in this region.
Example: 震度計 (shindokei) = Seismometer (for intensity).
マグニチュード = まぐにちゅーど = magunichūdo = magnitude (Richter scale or similar) - Magunichūdo is the Japanese loanword for "magnitude." It refers to the total energy released by an earthquake, as measured on scales like the Richter scale or moment magnitude scale. Unlike Shindo, magnitude is a single value for an entire earthquake event.
Example: その地震はマグニチュード8.0でした。 = (Sono jishin wa magunichūdo hachi-ten-zero deshita.) = That earthquake was magnitude 8.0.
津波 = つなみ = tsunami = tsunami, seismic sea wave - Tsunami is a famous Japanese word that has been adopted internationally. It refers to a tsunami or seismic sea wave, a series of extremely long waves in a body of water caused by a large-scale disturbance, most commonly an earthquake on the ocean floor.
Example: 津波警報が発令された。 = (Tsunami keihō ga hatsurei sareta.) = A tsunami warning has been issued.
Example: 津波が沿岸に押し寄せた。 = (Tsunami ga engan ni oshiyoseta.) = The tsunami surged towards the coast.
避難 = ひなん = hinan = evacuation, refuge, shelter - Hinan refers to "evacuation," "refuge," or "shelter" from danger, such as a natural disaster like an earthquake or tsunami.
Example: 地震の際は避難してください。 = (Jishin no sai wa hinan shite kudasai.) = Please evacuate in case of an earthquake.
Example: 避難所 (hinanjo) = evacuation shelter.
火山泥流 = かざん でいりゅう = kazan deiryū = lahar, volcanic mudflow - Kazan Deiryū is the most precise and commonly used Japanese term for "lahar" or "volcanic mudflow." A lahar is a destructive type of mudflow or debris flow composed of a slurry of pyroclastic material (volcanic ash and rock fragments) and water, which flows down from a volcano, typically along a river valley. - 火山 (kazan): volcano (as explained previously) 泥 (dei): mud, dirt 流 (ryū): flow, current - Together, these kanji literally mean "volcanic mud flow."
土石流 = どせきりゅう = dosekiryū = debris flow, mudslide (general term, not exclusively volcanic) - Dosekiryū is a broader term for a "debris flow" or "mudslide." While lahars are a type of debris flow, Dosekiryū is not exclusively volcanic. It can be caused by heavy rainfall in mountainous areas that mobilizes soil, rocks, and other debris, even without volcanic activity. - 土 (do): soil, earth 石 (seki): stone, rock 流 (ryū): flow, current - Together, literally "soil and rock flow."
Example: 集中豪雨で土石流が発生した。 = (Shūchū gōu de dosekiryū ga hassei shita.) = A debris flow occurred due to concentrated heavy rainfall.
環太平洋火山帯 = かんたいへいよう かざんたい = Kan-Taiheiyō Kazan-tai = Ring of Fire (Circum-Pacific Volcanic Belt) - Kan-Taiheiyō Kazan-tai is the most precise and formal Japanese term for the "Ring of Fire." It refers to the horseshoe-shaped zone that stretches around the rim of the Pacific Ocean, characterized by a high concentration of volcanoes and frequent earthquakes. - 環 (kan): ring, circle, circumference 太平洋 (taiheiyō): Pacific Ocean 火山帯 (kazan-tai): volcanic belt/zone 火山 (kazan): volcano 帯 (tai): belt, zone
Example: 日本は環太平洋火山帯に位置している。 (Nihon wa Kan-Taiheiyō Kazan-tai ni ichishite iru.) = Japan is located in the Ring of Fire. - Geological Term: This is a scientific and geographical term used to refer to this specific belt of volcanic and seismic activity. 
Example: 環太平洋火山帯では地震と火山活動が活発だ。 (Kan-Taiheiyō Kazan-tai de wa jishin to kazan katsudō ga kappatsu da.) = Earthquake and volcanic activity are vigorous in the Ring of Fire. - Formal and Informative: You'll see this term in news reports, textbooks, and documentaries about geology and natural disasters. 
とりあえず = とりあえず = toriaezu = for the time being, for now, first of all, at once - Toriaezu is a very common and useful Japanese adverb that conveys a sense of doing something as a temporary measure, as a first step, or for the time being. It implies that while it might not be the final or ideal solution, it's what needs to be done now.
ずっと = ずっと = zutto = all the time, all the way, continuously, much (more)
だろう = darou = In Japanese, "daro" () can be translated into English as "probably," "I think," "I guess," or "it seems." It's used to express a guess or an assumption about something, indicating a certain level of certainty or probability, but not a definitive statement. 
伊邪那岐 = いざなぎ = Izanagi = He Who Invites (male primordial deity) - Parents of Japan: Their most famous act is the creation of the Japanese archipelago (Ōyashima). Standing on the Floating Bridge of Heaven, Izanagi dipped his jeweled spear (Ame-no-Nuboko) into the primordial ocean. The dripping brine formed the first island, Onogoro-shima. Izanagi's Pursuit and Purification: Grief-stricken, Izanagi pursued her to Yomi. Witnessing her decaying form, he fled, sealing the entrance to Yomi and permanently separating the worlds of the living and the dead. To purify himself from the defilement of Yomi, Izanagi performed a cleansing ritual in a river.
伊邪那美 = いざなみ = Izanami = She Who Invites (female primordial deity) - Izanagi and Izanami are the central primordial deities in Japanese mythology, often considered the creator gods of Japan and many other kami (gods or spirits). Their story forms the cornerstone of the Shinto creation myth, found in ancient texts like the Kojiki and Nihon Shoki. - Creator Deities: They were the final pair of divine beings tasked by earlier gods with giving form to the chaotic Earth.
Amaterasu Ōmikami (天照大御神): = The sun goddess, born from his left eye. She is the most revered Shinto deity and the mythical ancestor of the Japanese Imperial family. - Birth of Major Deities: From Izanagi's purification, three of the most significant Shinto deities were born:
Tsukuyomi-no-Mikoto (月読命): = The moon god, born from his right eye. Procreation and Birth of Kami: After a flawed initial ritual (Izanami spoke first), they corrected it, and their union gave birth to the main islands of Japan, followed by numerous other kami representing natural elements like mountains, seas, trees, and wind.
Susanoo-no-Mikoto (須佐之男命): = The storm god and god of the sea, born from his nose.
カグツチ = かぐつち = Kagutsuchi = God of Fire (also known as Ho-Musubi-no-Kami or Homusubi) Kagutsuchi is the kami (god) of fire in Japanese mythology. He is tragically famous for being the last child born to the primordial deities Izanagi and Izanami, and his birth directly leads to Izanami's death and Izanagi's descent into Yomi, the land of the dead. Symbolism of Fire: Kagutsuchi embodies the duality of fire – its destructive power (causing Izanami's death, causing destruction) and its purifying/creative aspects (birth of new kami, its necessity for human life).
お疲れ様です = Otsukaresama desu = is a Japanese phrase used to express gratitude for someone's hard work or effort. It's a polite way of acknowledging their contributions and saying "good job" or "thank you" for their efforts.
無駄 = むだ = muda = waste, futility, uselessness, inefficiency - Muda refers to "waste" or "uselessness" in the context of processes, particularly in Lean manufacturing and management. It signifies any activity or resource consumption that does not add value to a product or service from the customer's perspective. Eliminating muda is a core principle of Lean. 無 (mu): nothing, naught, without 駄 (da): burden, loading, (sometimes implies uselessness or inferiority in compounds)
Example: この工程には多くの無駄がある。 (Kono kōtei ni wa ōku no muda ga aru.) = There is a lot of waste in this process. Non-Value-Adding Activities: The primary definition in Lean. Examples include overproduction, waiting, unnecessary transport, over-processing, excess inventory, unnecessary motion, and defects. 
Example: 時間の無駄。 (Jikan no muda.) = A waste of time. 
Example: 努力が無駄になった。 (Doryoku ga muda ni natta.) = The effort was in vain/wasted. - Futility/Uselessness: Can also be used in a more general sense to mean something is futile or pointless.
無理 = むり = muri = overburden, unreasonableness, impossible, excessive, strain - Muri refers to "overburden," "unreasonableness," "excessiveness," or "strain" in a system or on individuals. In Lean, muri describes the state where demands are placed on resources (people, equipment, processes) beyond their reasonable capacity, leading to stress, errors, and breakdowns. It causes muda. - 無 (mu): nothing, naught, without 理 (ri): reason, logic, principle - together, literally "without reason" or "illogical," leading to unreasonableness or excess.
Example: 従業員に無理をさせている。 (Jūgyōin ni muri o sasete iru.) = We are overburdening/straining the employees. - Overburden/Strain: Pushing a person or machine beyond their limit. 
Example: 無理な負荷。 (Muri na fuka.) = An excessive/unreasonable load. 
Example: それは無理な要求だ。 (Sore wa muri na yōkyū da.) = That's an unreasonable demand. - Impossibility/Unreasonableness: A more general meaning, as previously covered. 
Example: 無理しないでください。 (Muri shinaide kudasai.) = Please don't overdo it. - "Don't Overdo It": A common piece of advice
斑 = むら = mura = unevenness, inconsistency, irregularity, fluctuation - Mura refers to "unevenness," "inconsistency," "irregularity," or "fluctuation" in a process or operation. In Lean, mura highlights variations in workflow, demand, or quality that lead to muri (overburden) and ultimately muda (waste). It's about a lack of smooth, balanced flow. - These three terms (Muda, Muri, Mura) are collectively known as the "3 Ms" and are fundamental concepts in the Toyota Production System and Lean methodology, all representing different forms of inefficiency or waste that need to be eliminated to optimize processes. - 斑 (Mura): A kanji specifically meaning "spot," "speckle," or "unevenness." - ムラ (Mura): Katakana representation, often used when referring to this specific concept of unevenness/irregularity in a business or philosophical context.
Example: 生産ラインにムラがある。 (Seisan rain ni mura ga aru.) = There is unevenness/inconsistency in the production line. - Inconsistency/Irregularity in Process: 
Example: 仕事の質にムラがある。 (Shigoto no shitsu ni mura ga aru.) = The quality of work is inconsistent. 
Example: 天気はムラがある。 (Tenki wa mura ga aru.) = The weather is unpredictable/fluctuating. - Fluctuation/Unevenness (general): Can also refer to general unevenness, like patchy coloring or uneven growth.
了解しました = りょうかい しました = ryōkai shimashita = Understood; Roger that (Polite & Common) - Ryōkai Shimashita is a very common and polite way to say "Understood" or "Roger that." It's widely used in business, military, and everyday polite contexts to confirm that a message or instruction has been received and understood. - 了解 (ryōkai): Understanding, comprehension, acknowledgment. しました (shimashita): Polite past form of する (suru - to do).
Example: ご指示、了解しました。 (Go-shiji, ryōkai shimashita.) = Your instructions, understood. 
メッセージを受け取りました = めっせーじ を うけとりました = messēji o uketorimashita = Message received (Polite)
検査 = けんさ = kensa = inspection, examination, check-up, test, screening - Kensa is a very versatile word that covers a wide range of inspections, examinations, check-ups, tests, or screenings. It implies a systematic process of looking into something to confirm its condition, quality, or presence.
だろう (darou) = This is a plain form of the auxiliary verb that expresses conjecture, probability, or seeking confirmation. It's similar to "probably," "I think," "it seems," or "right?" xample: もう時間だろう？ (Mō jikan darou?) - meaning: It's already time, right? - 
Example: 彼はもう食べただろう？ (Kare wa mō tabetā darou?) = Meaning: He's already eaten, right?
接続 = せつぞく = setsuzoku = connection (physical, network, electrical, internet) - This is the most common term for physical connections, network connections (like internet or Wi-Fi), electrical connections, or connecting devices. It implies a direct link or hook-up.
Example: インターネットに接続する (intānetto ni setsuzoku suru) = to connect to the internet.
Example: ケーブル接続 (kēburu setsuzoku) = cable connection.
Example: 電話が接続されない (denwa ga setsuzoku sarenai) = The phone is not connecting.
だろうね = "Darou ne" = in Japanese translates to "right?", "isn't it?", or "I think so, right?" It's a combination of "darou" (だろう), which conveys probability or conjecture, and "ne" (ね), which seeks agreement or confirmation
検問所 = けんもんじょ / けんもんしょ = kenmonjo / kenmonsho = checkpoint, check station - 検問 (kenmon): This part means "inspection" or "interrogation/questioning at a barrier." - 所 (sho / jo): This kanji means "place" or "location." - So, 検問所 (kenmonjo / kenmonsho) literally means an "inspection place" or a "questioning place," which directly translates to checkpoint or check station. - This term is used for: - Roadblocks where police or military inspect vehicles or people. - Security checkpoints at entrances to certain facilities. - Historical checkpoints along old roads.
挙国 = きょこく = kyokoku = the whole nation, nationwide - This term means "the whole nation" or "nationwide," often implying a collective effort or action involving the entire country. - It's frequently seen in phrases like: 
挙国一致 (kyokoku itchi) = National unity; "unity of the nation" (e.g., in times of crisis or war, meaning the entire nation acts as one). - 
挙国体制 (kyokoku taisei) = A nationwide system or structure.
峡谷 = きょうこく = kyōkoku = gorge, ravine, canyon - This term specifically refers to a gorge, ravine, or canyon, which is a deep, narrow valley with steep sides.
いじめ = いじめ = ijime = bullying, harassment, teasing, tormenting (noun) - This is the most common and widely recognized term for bullying in Japan, particularly in school contexts. It refers to a wide range of actions, both physical and psychological, used to torment or persecute someone weaker.
いじめる = いじめる = ijimeru = to bully, to torment, to tease, to persecute (verb) - This is the verb form of いじめ (ijime). It means "to bully" or to subject someone to the act of ijime.
倉庫 = そうこ = sōko = warehouse, storage, storehouse - Sōko is the standard and most common term for a warehouse, storage facility, or storehouse in Japanese. It refers to a building used for storing goods, materials, or products.
供給品 = きょうきゅうひん = kyōkyūhin = supplies, provisions, goods supplied - This is a general term for items that are supplied or provided. It's broad and can refer to various types of provisions or goods.
物資 = ぶっし = busshi = goods, materials, supplies (often for specific purposes like aid, military) - Busshi is a very common term for materials, goods, or supplies, often used in contexts like emergency relief supplies, military supplies, or strategic materials. It has a slightly more formal or official nuance than just "goods."
備品 = びひん = bihin = equipment, fixtures, supplies (for a specific place, like office supplies) - Bihin refers to equipment or supplies that are regularly kept or provided for use in a specific place, such as an office, factory, or school. It often implies items that are relatively durable or essential for the operation of that place. オフィス備品 (ofisu bihin) = office supplies/equipment
必需品 = ひつじゅひん = hitsujuhin = necessities, essentials, essential supplies - This term means necessities or essential goods/supplies – things that are indispensable for daily life or a particular activity.
補給品 = ほきゅうひん = hokyūhin = replenishment supplies, resupply items - This term specifically refers to supplies used for replenishment or resupply, often in a military, logistical, or long-term operational context.
耐震 = Taishin = Strength/Rigidity - This approach emphasizes building structures with sufficient strength and rigidity to resist the forces of an earthquake. It involves reinforcing structural components like walls, beams, and pillars with specific materials. 
制震 = Seishin = Vibration Control - Seishin aims to mitigate the effects of earthquakes by incorporating systems that absorb and dissipate the energy of ground shaking. This often involves using dampers, such as oil dampers or pendulum systems, which convert kinetic energy into heat, reducing the building's sway. 
免震 = Menshin = Base Isolation - Menshin is the most advanced earthquake-resistant technology, involving isolating the building from the ground. This is achieved by placing the building on layers of materials like rubber, steel, and lead that allow the ground to move independently of the structure. This significantly reduces the amount of shaking that reaches the building. 
こうしましょう = kō shimashou = Let's do it this way / Let's do this
業績 = ぎょうせき = gyōseki = performance (business, results, achievement) - Gyōseki refers to business performance, results, achievements, or accomplishments, especially in a corporate or financial context. 
会社の業績 (kaisha no gyōseki) = company performance (business results). - 
Example: 営業業績 (eigyo gyōseki) = sales performance.
自由 = じゆう = jiyū = freedom, liberty - Jiyū is the most direct and widely used translation for "freedom" or "liberty" in a general sense, covering concepts like:
言論の自由 (genron no jiyū) = Freedom of speech
信仰の自由 (shinkō no jiyū) = Freedom of religion
個人の自由 (kojin no jiyū) = Personal freedom
移動の自由 (idō no jiyū) = Freedom of movement
自由に〜する (jiyū ni ~ suru) = "To be free to do something"
子供っぽい = こどもっぽい = kodomoppoi = childish, childlike - This is the most common and direct translation for "childish." - 子供 (kodomo): child - っぽい (-ppoi): a suffix meaning "ish" or "like," indicating a tendency or resemblance.
彼の行動は子供っぽい。(Kare no kōdō wa kodomoppoi.) = His behavior is childish. - It can be used both negatively Example (negative) (immature, silly) and sometimes positively (innocent, playful, in a good way, depending on context).
彼女はいくつになっても子供っぽいところがある。(Kanojo wa ikutsu ni nattemo kodomoppoi tokoro ga aru.) = She has a childlike side no matter how old she gets. Example (can be positive): 
幼稚な = ようちな = yōchi na = childish, immature, infantile - This term is more formal and almost exclusively used in a negative sense. It strongly implies immaturity, lack of sophistication, or being undeveloped (like a child's thinking or actions). It often sounds more critical. - It's an adjective that takes 「な (na)」 when directly modifying a noun. - 
example: 幼稚な考え (yōchi na kangae) = childish thinking. - 
Example: 彼の言うことは全く幼稚だ。(Kare no iu koto wa mattaku yōchi da.) = What he says is completely childish/immature.
大人げない = おとなげない = otonagenai = immature (for an adult), undignified, childish (for an adult) - This term is specifically used for adults acting in a childish, undignified, or petty way. It implies that the behavior is inappropriate for someone of their age or status. - 大人 (otona): adult - げない (-genai): a suffix indicating a lack of something (here, the qualities expected of an adult). 
Example: そんなことで怒るなんて、大人げない。(Sonna koto de okoru nante, otonagenai.) = Getting angry over something like that is childish/undignified (for an adult).
この野郎 = このやろう = kono yarou = You bastard! / You jerk! / You son of a bitch! / Damn you! (Highly insulting)














